From their site:
For the beans: the day before, sort the beans to discard any dirty or broken beans, then wash, place them in a bowl with water (three times the volume of beans) then drain the water, repeat this three times, then let the beans soak in water overnight, early in the morning drain the water and rinse, place in a pot and cook for 20 minutes then drain the water and add cold water and bring to a boil again, repeat this step thee times then add a pinch of sodium bicarbonate and cook until they are tender, or use a pressure pot. I do this in order to make the beans lighter … digestible.
The National Council on Crime and Delinquency announced winners of its annual Prevention for a Safer Society (PASS) awards to print and broadcast journalists, TV news and feature reporters, producers, writers, and those in film and literature “who focus America’s attention on our criminal justice, juvenile justice, child welfare, and adult protection systems in a thoughtful and considerate manner.”
You can become Exalted with Darnassus by buying a Darnassus Tabard and wearing it while in any instance, including low level ones. You will get reputation for every mob killed. The mounts are all available from Darnassus.
- Robbie Shakespeare: basse, guitare rythmique
Then there was the Publican.
However, Jeff loved his daughter so much, he’d defied his own wife and risked everything. Moody had recognized who wore the pants in their relationship and saw Jeff’s courage as a positive sign.
(Not) dealing with the heat: It was a sweltering day - the event started at noon and very little if anything was done to provide more shade or cooling/ hydration stations for guests. They could have easily taking a cue from Vegas and set up misters, fans, water stations or even more canopies, umbrellas or tents to provide shade. The only water that was provided to guests was at the Fiji 'cafe', which had long lines, and a real estate agent's booth (water source unknown).
the Junior League,
Mr Sheridan then asked specifically about Stephen Whittamore. Mr Wight admitted using his services as he provided information that could help move stories on. Mr Wight could not recall who had originally passed him the name of Mr Whittamore, but denied that it was Andy Coulson as he was not at the NotW at the time, and that it probably wasn’t Greg Miskiw either. Mr Sheridan asked what Mr Wight knew of Mr Whittamore now. Mr Wight responded that he knew Mr Whittamore had been prosecuted for accessing data in breach of the Data Protection Act.
You can see my work space reflected in my dressing table mirror!
“There are fifteen zombies on the other side of this door,” Violet said flatly.
riding the polished lenses
We started with a die cut - white cardstock and adhesive sheet, cut on the cuttlebug. A clear ultra-fine glitter was laid over the entire thing and well-burnished in. Then we used peel-off outline stickers to create a design (the butterfly/flower shape and circles).
Overseeing a homeowner association’s finances to ensure proper maintenance of the common elements is a fundamental responsibility of the board. Following a properly prepared reserve study is a big piece of that puzzle. But how does the board know how much money to set aside in reserves each year? Full Story: http://realtytimes.com/rtpages/20120502_hoafinances.htm
I didn't realize that at first, and am now way surpirsed that I finished it.
So, I give my kid's eye candy in the form of books and art, where is my eye candy? Any of you willing to share photo's of your play zones for me to drool over? Come on, as I preach to my kiddos on a daily basis, "We Share Because We Care"!
'Cause I may not hate it HERE, but you can bet your ass I hate PEOPLE.
I've used a gorgeous Miss Anya from The Greeting Farm, which I stamped while staying with my BFF Helen...thanks Helen...waving :) I'm ashamed to say she's been sitting in my drawer for a loooong time, with her sisters, waiting to be coloured up :( The image panel was then matted with SU Merely Mustard and adhered to the background page with repositionable glue so that it can be removed and recycled...can't bear the thoughts of having to throw her away when the calendar expires!!
I had a request to make this frame as a mother's day present. I used the Chomas Creations adjustable pen holder for the Cricut with a Sakura Glitter gel pen. I drew the words with the Expression2,and without removing my mat, I replaced the blade to cut shadow around them. Because I love all the glitter, I then colored in the letters with the glitter pen. These pens color really well!
I love cobalt blue glassware. It does not go so well with the colors in my house. But I collect it anyway..........just cause.
NAB booth #SU8012
Breivik even think that this incident was under cover in the Norwegian press as it was approaching parliamentary elections, and that one did not want to increase support for the Progress Party to describe the noise in the immigrant communities.
kimchi kimbap: add chopped drained kimchi
A vacation in the Sundarbans is enchanting and equally exciting with the natural and wild life that surrounds you when here. The Sundarbans National Park situated in West Bengal is the center of an extremely lush, rich and diverse fauna and flora. The Sundarbans National Park offers an array of unique and luxurious nature resorts, hotels, wild life jungle lodges and forest camps. These accommodations are located in the inner as well as the outer areas of the Sundarbans Wildlife Sanctuary. The luxury resorts in the Sundarbans can be booked as per the season of the visit.
Even with continuing changes to the tax law, the ability to make deductible contributions to a well-designed qualified retirement plan remains one of the most advantageous and safest tax benefits available to your clients under the Internal Revenue Code.
“It was Gareth’s idea,” Alexandre admitted.
Good Night and God Bless.
When the milk is ready, remove from the water and allow to cool completely. Once cooled, open and stir well.
(click ad) Headline translation: LISTEN TO YOUR GUT FEELING. My immediate gut reaction was, no way this is a real ad. But full credits, including account team and post production, are listed at the source. So, quite possibly real. Usually scam ads only have the two or three creatives who made it listed. (If you live in Germany, and have seen this, please comment.) That's a freaky belly button—are those sesame seeds? Ad agency: Interone, Munich. Note: Stupidity-wise, compare this to the infamous Burger King blow job ad.
SV: I think we were racing, it was not a scheduled ÔI move right, you move left, I move left, you move right, I brake here, you brake there.’ As Mark said, he stayed flat out and tried to race me, as hard as he could, didn’t find his way past. To me, at this stage it’s quite amusing.
Satisfying thud as I slammed
- Classic Constructed
…consider this choice: If you’re in a public arena — maybe on an airplane — which of these activities would make you most uncomfortable to be seen doing: Flipping through a copy of Playboy, or reading the Bible? You’d probably have to think about this question, because there are elements of awkwardness in either action. But on the whole, you’ll likely be concerned that somebody nearby will judge you harshly for reading the Bible, whereas Playboy is more mainstream.
The Empire Mall in Sioux Falls draws shoppers from rural communities in eastern South Dakota and western Minnesota and even north western Iowa. Our Mall may not be as large as those found in the Cities but it offers something for everyone.
The next few cans also exploded under fire, spraying liquid ten feet in the air, but those plastic bullets simply vanished. One fired into the end grain of a log also vanished, leaving a mark behind.
You need to go where your community is. Identify constituent groups to target – prospects, customers, influencers, evan­gelists, opinion leaders – and find out if they use social media. Delve into specifics. Are they reading any particular blogs? Are they on Twitter? Facebook? Find your community and study them to see what their concerns are. We examine this process in depth in the section Find Your Community.
There was no connection between the victims except that all were black, and police cautioned they had yet to develop a motive.
Quartz chemical composition is silicon dioxide, SiO2 and it has a hardness of 7 on the Mohs scale of hardness.Legend has it that quartz is an amplifier it hieghtens the effects of whatever stones are around it. Quartz also removes blockages so that we can be more present and clear, more grounded in our crown Chakra and more fine toned.It also helps with psychic abilities, balance and relaxation.
So, in short, I’d go back and enjoy a drink. At 12 Euros a cocktail, it’s fair – but not cheap.
The hardest part is me remembering everything they have to do each day. On Tuesdays, Little Miss goes to the school library and needs to return her books. I have to remember to write that on the Monday tasks.
Card Stock: Bazzill Dotted Swiss
Rollant li ber le pluret, sil duluset;
We'll never have to lose it again
The ideal candidate for this position should have experience as a blogger, be familiar with journalistic standards and have a passion for building a following through social media. Photoshop and HTML/FBML skills are also a plus.
A road paved with heartaches and tears
I knock hoping you won’t open
Of course no potato harvest would be compete without a celebration, so we took advantage of one of the fast disappearing warm evenings and had a meal outside. Of course there was vodka and wine, toasts and tears, food and more food, and then more food and dessert. The perfect reward for an afternoon of hard work.
Once again a book that invites you with best seller titles but you wonder whether it will be good or not since you do not know the author at all. Rich Dad, Poor Dad is one such book that I have looked at many times but never read till now. But my experimental streak got better off me recently and I ended up reading this book. It belongs of genre of self-help and deals with financial independence. Robert T. Kiyosaki has written this book along with Sharon L. Lechter and it is based on his growing up under the shadow of two influential men and how he learnt things that helped him to become rich.
Ink: Clearsnap (Pigment: magenta, citrine, black & Chalk: pink pastel)
It is the story in 2 kgs 5 about a man named Naaman that heard there was a great (I’m paraphrasing )
48. Beer Drinkers and Hell Raisers -- ZZ Top
I only teach two days a week. The rest of the time, I am immersed in life with my own kids.
did you use/intend to use any material alongside it in the exam?
Me: "Ok, I'm going to eat it then."
Kenneth shook his head. “Fuck no!” He retorted with a laugh. “After all the shit that’s been going on?”
And someone else, whose creations I adore, has joined the team too. But my lips are tightly sealed (for now). We are both, needless to say, very lucky to be given the opportunity to play with such gorgeous vintage-style designs.
TOP 10 MYTHS ABOUT INTROVERTS
Good news – I got a 97/100 on my mustache video and I finished that class with an A!
Now you are ready to pass it through the machine at smaller settings until you get to desired thickness.
But, it's brings up a some questions for the purpose of broader discussion.
Still a little stumped, unfortunately.
* MIB frees Ben, tells him to come to the Hydra station.
That's the big key for me here. I'm hoping that on the weekends when time isn't so pressed, I'll still do a couple of my favourite P90X workouts for an extra burn. Like KenPo, Plyo, Fountain of Youth yoga, or even stretch to keep things long and limber.
Coco was one of those special people that made our stay memorable. Coco and her husband have this apartment in the hub of Dijon, everything within walking distance and our own museum across the walkway.
Communication Style
After I smoothed the chocolate mixture out, I put both pies in the freezer to chill and harden while I made the whipped cream topping. I simply beat the heavy cream and sugar together util soft peaks formed. This took a couple of minutes, during which time the Leafs scored twice on the Penguins. I restrained my anger in case the pies could sense it and become bitter.
I ate far too much and literally had to loosen my belt a notch. It shortened the excess a bit, which was nice.
This list acts as a best of the best short list as well. These are the books I'll turn back to in the future whenever I need something that won't disappoint or I need a recharge of some sort.
Every time I meet a Jew, I can chose to act like a politician. Not telling Him, that horrible times are under way. That all “security doctrines” will fail.
pesky newspaper photographer
six any more.
In Como, you can take the funicular - a near-vertical journey that's bound to thrill you - up to Brunate, which is situated 700 m above the town. You can see all the way to Milan from this vantage point, making it an unforgettable highlight of your trip.
Before and After World War Two
2He was in great fear, because Gibeon was a great town, like one of the king’s towns, greater than Ai, and all the men in it were men of war.
It’s curious to me why Elvis was never and largely continues to not be taken seriously as an artist.
We picked up freelance graphics jobs from around our school district and earned enough money to pay for training trips to Seattle, San Francisco, and other cool places. I got my first illustrating/graphics freelance job on my own when I was 17 doing a series of books/workbooks teaching kids to be safe. I would also draw comics of my friends and their exploits, and I would draw some really complex stuff for my best friends.
Okay, so the big rebellion is over and everyone in Inside knows that they are in a ship flying through space. A BIG freaking ship. The uppers and scrubs are attempting to get along, Trella and Riley are happy and more levels are being built in the expanse. But how long does harmony last on a ship like this? Not very long at all.
Gaelic is spoken mainly in the Hebrides- not Shetland or Orkney, which were pledged by the King of Norway as a dowry for his daughter, and whose language and ritual still show some Norse influence. But a great deal of Glasgow’s population came from the Highland Clearances, so their ancestors were Gaelic speakers. So my friend, though she and her husband spoke no Gaelic sent her son to a Gaelic-speaking nursery, and even I dabbled a bit, though I got no further than Kimmer a Hahu and Hammy Skee. A man called Domhnull told us to call him Doll: if we tried to mimic the Gaelic pronunciation we only mangled it further.
Granted, we are sometimes blindsided by our ignorance or instinctively wrong about our responses to life. But thankfully, God is never blindsided. And, He’s never wrong. From His vantage point He has a clear view of Satan’s destructive attempts to thud our lives. So, like Bobby’s mom, He warns us with clear and unmistakable shouts from His Word. God’s Word is full of warnings about things like greed, selfishness, lying, lust, gossip, hatred, bitterness, envy, argumentative attitudes, stealing, murmuring, oppression, and ignoring the needs of the poor and underprivileged. So, it’s not that there is a lack of clarity in His voice. The problem is ours. Too often, like Bobby, we either are not listening, or we just don’t care.
Pood is my life raft.
Well, I am hoping that the weather will turn out fine soon cause I can't b ear the heat anymore. For the mean time, let me freshen up myself by making a cold iced tea.
Strength: C.J. McCollum is one of the best kept secrets nationally, but he’s about to get his time to shine on the big stage. He does everything for the Mountain Hawks. He can create for himself or his teammates and doesn’t mind rebounding either. This is a guy who’s carried them all year and if they’re to have any success in the tournament he’s going to have to do the same.
Before you jump to any conclusions, we are a very sane set of people , not the archetypal biker boys( and gals). Our group has the most interesting set of people that I pride in calling brothers.
An Evening in Killarney
On the CBA
And all that dance as you do.
My blood pressure has been up since I got home and my head is aching so I am trying to take it easy and bring it down if I can.
“How are you today?” asked the woman whose nametag identified her as “Hello My Name Is Marilyn.”
Until the 18th century, in the Western world as elsewhere around the planet, the core language of political rhetoric came from religion. From monarchs who based their claims to legitimacy on theories of the divine right of kings, straight across the spectrum to revolutionaries who borrowed the rhetoric of Old Testament prophets to call for the slaughter of the rich, political argument drew primarily on theology’s vision of an eternal order imperfectly reflected in the material cosmos. Conservatives argued that the existing structure of society more or less mirrored God’s order, or would do so if the liberals would only shut up and behave; liberals argued that the existing structure of society was moving toward a more perfect reflection of God’s order, and would get there more quickly if the conservatives would only stop dragging their heels; and radicals argued that the existing structure of society was in utter conflict with God’s order, and had to be terminated with extreme prejudice (along, often enough, with the liberals and the conservatives) so that a new and perfect world can come into being.
For all 7 weeks, we are committing to eating only 7 types of food: fruits, vegetables, chicken, cheese, whole grain bread, yogurt/butter and eggs. This means I (Caleb) will be giving up coffee (gasp) but I refuse to let go of butter – Julia Childs would be proud.
Steve was so tired that I told him to go below to get some sleep while I stayed on anchor watch in the cockpit. About two hours later Neville from Panache called on the radio about our position. We told him that we were keeping an eye on it but that our starter was acting up, which was the truth, so it was difficult for us to move. We agreed to just keep an eye on the situation. At one time we were swinging about one and a half boat lengths in front of Panache. I sat on watch until 3 a.m. when Steve came up to take over until 7:30 in the morning.
The music nights draw ever nearer. The SXSW Film and Interactive starts tomorrow....Friday the thirteenth!
I realised I had wasted my energy fighting over the stupidest thing.The IPL keeps him so busy and in a happy mood that I can do my own thing without any interference at all.So now I chat up with old buddies.Share gossip with my girlfriends.Read a book peacefully without having to get up now and then to fetch something for the husband (Finally and thankfully).So with this new and happy realisation I have found out my own ways to unwind without biting off my husband’s head.
We tried to circumnavigate the challenges. But, Murphy’s Law became the expected with its usual flare-ups and eruptions of job loss, loss of home, and the stresses of our life. Why, were we Murphy’s Choice?
Now, let’s go back to September of last year, when Joe Biden said of the stimulus:
Embarrassingly, it turns out that the entire story - which came complete with a statement from the court declaring that the sentence was "an appropriate way to 'get back at' the spirit which entered the poor dog" - was an almost total fabrication. Something of a shaggy dog story, in fact.
- The bed--linens, mattress, and pillows-were exceptionally comfortable (Yes, I lifted up the sheets to find out who made that mattress. It's a Simmons "HealthSmart." And get this, the pillow top unzips from the mattress so you can wash it. Genius!)
Sleeping is not Meditation
The event I was attending was a small international gathering primarily of indigenous environmental leaders. I was privileged to be among the few nonindigenous writer-activists invited to join them. …
So what sayest thou? Who do you think has to be handled with care to sound "right"? Who are some writers who are really good at nailing it, and where have there been times when you were left scratching your head (how on earth did that guy get that assignment?)? Thank you for your thoughts!
05 Movin' Out (Anthony's Song)
2-3 cups finely chopped rhubarb
The reindeer advance on the kitties small . . .
Where: Visiting Cleveland
Additionally, even through high school, you can take whatever class you want. So if you want to take Algebra with a local tutor and all your other courses through Kolbe and six other programs, you can still report through Kolbe and earn a diploma through them as long as you meet the graduation requirements.
Lastly, this poem, I believe applies to both men and women because this is advice everyone can use. It’s not about being “a man” as much as a decent human being.
Bitterness Units: 30
Originally from Portland, Oregon, Heidi has worked as a corporate litigator at Cravath, Swaine & Moore, and as a Life Skills trainer to professional athletes of the National Football League and National Basketball Association. She is the co-host of the award-winning weekly podcast Mixed Chicks Chat; and the co-founder and co-producer of the Mixed Roots Film & Literary Festival, an annual free public event, that celebrates stories of the Mixed experience. The Girl who fell from the sky is Heidi’s debut book AND it is the winner of the Bellwether Prize for best fiction manuscript addressing issues of social justice-chosen by Barbara Kingsolver.
One deems this form of verse to be the perv-ect vehicle with which to leave a few tyre treads over certain inhospitable portions of a sub-culture- for the most part charming- that is threatened, every-once-in-a-great-while, by over-zealous adherents, who may have a tendency to froth over into waves of pomposity, at but the slightest provocation.
Mix the closet up this spring and make it personable.
Here are some challenges...
As the week goes on, I'll share some background on producing the companion, as well as announce the next New Big Dragon project. (And it's not the Sandbox Companion, or the PDF version of the d30 DM Companion; stay tuned!)
with warm baby lotion. Over by a battered speeder
I miss them already.
In Lane 8 next to me, twelve shoppers who'd arrived at the store after I’d switched check-out lanes had already paid for their purchases, and returned home. Several of them had already eaten spaghetti for dinner and were now cuddled on the couch with loved ones, watching the X-Factor finals.
Because it’s Friday, and they’re outrageous, I’m sharing.
1 c. red bell pepper, diced
4 – 7 p.m. North Coast Brewing, Sampling in the Beer Department
Value each piece for it's size.
Subway tile back splash
Him: "No, wait, I wasn't ready. Starting...Now!"
adele got kicked out of the house because she was not coming home. My parents had to come to that decision sadly since she would not listen.. :-( She is staying at a friends.. some people brought one of gypsy's old puppies and she was adorable. :-) I had a really crappy day last week driving with dad which ended up with me in tears after I got home he had a bad day too and it was a day i made a lot of mistakes can't seem to do anything right and dad was upset with me I could tell and it made me self-conscious and then really I couldn't do anything right i feel like i'm 10 years old again and I think no matter what i do he'll be mad at me..
Humans like simplicity. The easiest response is “Pick one.” But how do you choose? They can’t do that because it runs counter to the reason the two joined forces in the first place: to give the team options and create impossible mismatches. Sure it makes it easier for the other team if they (and everyone else in the building) knows exactly where the ball is going in the final seconds of the game. But doesn’t that make it easier on that guy, too?
But then someday’s, like today, I want no-NEED to be reminded.
It's a decent set, I'll admit. But it wasn't that great. It was just OK. Not a great design, but not bad by any means. I still think the making-photos-look-like-paintings thing wore out its welcome a few years ago, in my opinion. (Perhaps the case with A&G, but that's for a different post.)
You know that most of that coloured wrapping paper we all love can't be recycled, don't you? Just consider something new, exciting and recyclable this holiday season. Now, some of you ladies who read my blog are very crafty and creative indeed, and you certainly have a way with a ribbon.
Okay so you're back? Good. Personally, I started off on the internet just like that, never using any part of my name, then gradually moved to using my first name. It took me a very long time to type my surname into any box on the internet. Then I finally plucked up the courage to buy something on ebay. I can't remember exactly what it was, a postage stamp probably (because I collect them). Then I bought another one, then another one. Then something slightly more expensive, a book. Then maybe a camera battery and so on. I think the most expensive thing I have bought on there was probably about AU$40. For now, that's about my limit. I have only sent a large amount of money across the internet once, but that was to a blogging 'friend' (as well as you can know someone online).
With my free hand, I pushed my shorts down and wriggled them off me so I’d have free motion. I touched my balls, which I keep shaved when L is around, but two weeks after her last visit, there’s stubble, rough to my fingers, but I will shave again next week before she gets here. They like being touched, even by me, although this is far, far from what I want.
Meanwhile the chaps were having a few battles of their own, the final results for the club are below while full results can be found HERE
As I get older, I lean toward recipes that speak to my heritage. I’m part Polish and I see those tendencies cropping up in what I cook, eat and think about eating; really anything with cabbage, potatoes, and caraway. I would feel right at home in Eastern Europe. For now, Canter’s will do the job.
We got there on Wednesday because Gerry was a volunteer. It meant that we got to get a good camp site and hold down space for our friends, but the real fun began once all our friends showed up. We've camped with the same families for a couple of years now and the kids enjoy playing together. It's fun to catch up and watch their kids grow as the summers pass. We brought our hammock as did another family and the kids had lots of fun playing in them.
Moral of the story is this: A chimney sweep IS as lucky as lucky can be… and I am LUCKY to make it out of this one.
The breeze of the morn
a pat of butter/margarine
I hate this word! Like most people, I have been more than touched by cancer within my family. I also have the breast cancer gene mutation which freaks me out more than just a little. The decisions I know have to make suck to say the least, but at least I have the options to make decisions (about the only positive that I see in knowing that I have the gene, well along with knowing that my kids are at risk instead of not knowing.
After visiting Little Alsace, a cluster of 40 timber framed houses that were built for workers on rue Daviel in 1913, not even the rain and faulty umbrellas purchased in haste could spoil the beauty of the wisteria adorning the homes on another quaint street, villa Daviel. Perhaps there is hope for me after all. Tour, anyone? I can't wait to return to La Butte aux Cailles on a sunny day!
Florida’s “Stand Your Ground” law:
The answer was a resounding no.
Choo or his officers did not have any discussion with Mumpang or failed to interview him.
Montana was so pleased with her efforts that she promptly sat down and ate several… in a row.
Add cut veggies and goat cheese into hummus and stir.
You know when people keep saying “I hate Mondays”, “Mondays suck”, “This and that did not go well – oh,wait, it’s because it’s Monday…”.
Pushing aside the fact that the size of one's tits certainly do not maketh the woman, it is very hard not to become enraged at the horrible treatment this woman was subjected to - and hard not to admire her gall. For any non-American, such as myself, who has little knowledge of American history, Angelou's book is terribly educative.
I thought maybe you would like to see this one as well.
Commenting, Andy Mulcahy, Head of Communications at IMRG, said “There has been a lot of concern in the industry that the new cookie requirements could prove disruptive to the user experience and lead to potential customers leaving a site through concern at what they are agreeing to by accepting cookies. While many consumers seem to find the whole concept of cookies and what they are used for confusing, the fact that such a high percentage regard the new regulation as a positive step suggests that there is actually a real opportunity for retailers to increase trust and loyalty through a clear, unobtrusive and customer-friendly cookie notification process.“
Spain’s labor market has been hard hit by the collapse of a decadelong housing boom and by budget cuts that are removing tens of billions of euros from the economy. In addition, rigid labor laws make it easier to dismiss workers than to adjust their wages or change their duties. Spain’s unemployment rate is more than double the 10.7% euro-zone average, and now totals about 5.6 million people.
Life’s too short for me to stop -
I hung up and winked at my new companion.
The Pending Home Sales Index is a leading indicator for the housing sector, based on pending sales of existing homes. A sale is listed as pending when the contract has been signed but the transaction has not closed, though the sale usually is finalized within one or two months of signing.
As some of you know, the theme for my youngest daughter's 2nd birthday was chosen due to her obsession with cheese :) It seemed only natural to have a cheese and mice themed party.
You must be 18 years or older.
We just returned from Walt Disney World and I had a marvelous time!
Naflakusk
So, in order to not be bullied, you have to accept happiness, and not care that you are no longer a faceless drone.
De Blasio issued a statement stating that, “With thousands of units of affordable housing and jobs hanging in the balance, the number of unanswered questions and the level of uncertainty surrounding this project is unacceptable. Forest City Ratner must immediately provide the community with a timeline for construction, including all units of affordable housing, and release any revisions that have been made to the General Project Plan to date. We cannot tolerate further demolitions and certainly will not consider additional public investment in this project until these very reasonable requests are met.”
So, here’s my ideal power couple. Have a great weekend.
Life is life, fight for it!
Another victim by her own hand is Sarah Palin, who gave a timid non-endorsement endorsement to Gingrich during the primaries. She is still incomprehensibly urging the Speaker to stay all the way to the convention. We say, nuts Sarah! Her position at Fox would be weakened unless she changes her tune and gets on the Romney campaign with more enthusiasm. We are not counting on that since Sarah hasn't proven to have
In an interview with Der Spiegel, reported by Petroleum World yesterday, OPEC Secretary-General Abdalla Salem el-Badri fielded questions on a wide range of energy-related issues. At one point the dialogue turned to nuclear energy and the technology needed for it: "SPIEGEL: How do you feel about the international resurgence of nuclear energy? Does nuclear power belong in the energy mix of industrialized countries?
I dream of tigers.
Those driven by racism also joined in the fun seeing Islamophobia as the last legitimate refuge to peddle their race-fueled hate. Phil Woolas was the man responsible for making Islamaphobia a national sport and while I'm sure he will be repulsed by the activities of the British National Party and the English Defence League they thrived in this atmosphere.
With everything in his field of vision accounted for Jack made the sudden realization, that whatever disturbance he was feeling was behind him sharing the bed. Ridiculous visions of a lonely jaguar or amorous python that walked or crawled into his house during the night momentarily filled his head but after slowly turning over Jack knew the situation to be far worse.
You need:
By the way he talked to them.
When you want to configure your own system however, it takes a bit of research. First you have to know what you want to use the computer for, and then secondly, limit yourself to that benchmark. Because when I first started looking, I wanted the MOST RAM (Random Access Memory) and the MOST HDD (Hard Disk Drive) space, because I naturally assumed more meant faster processing speeds.
Ken O'Connell will teach "Sketchbooks in Italy" for the 5th time in Italy September 2-16, 2102.
I smiled, and kissed her lips.
Arrive at Dromoland Castle
But fair enough alcohol in general when misused can cause damage to the user and others around them, but surely these societies have been allowed to keep running and be set up in the first place because they promote moderate drinking in a safe environment, whilst also providing some educational backing for the subject, even if there's never going to be a degree for pub quizology.
One study, from Children’s Hospital Boston, looked at the emotional and behavioral problems of children and teens referred to its specialty clinic for evaluation and possible medical treatment.
The Mallards flew in
here is the view from our "family room" area:
Certain people seem to want nothing more than to get a rise out of me, and it hasn’t worked, so far.
see how it is like a
Their familiarity with different parts guards you against fake parts which might be offered elsewhere for replacement.
Okay, well, it off to bed soon so stay safe!
Des miracles du jour il colle les affiches.
Every family has to draw their own lines and boundaries. Our home has had a place for Barbie, but not for a Bratz doll. We watch My Little Pony and Transformers (and listen to Kidz Bop), but I draw the line at iCarly and Big Time Rush. If my kids ever wanted to read Twilight, they would be way out of luck. These are my gut reactions, and other families have different gut reactions. Our gut reactions are the first level of decision-making as parents: we know what we’re willing to let into our homes, and what we’re not.
My trainer made fun of me for wearing pink today.
yes (+10)
Each year the prize is judged by well known writers - this year we are delighted to have
Length - 69cm (71%)
o Exercise
2. C.O & Bigelow My Favorite Lip Balm - glorious everyday Lip Balm avec nourishing shea butter, sweet almond oil and wheat germ to condition and soothe lips in need of care. Easy to wear under or over lip color. Great everyday balm.
"But they said ..."
This view is different. You still see trees, dips, and potholes, but you also see the horizon.
CENTIPEDE
Set Pieces: (7/10) – Again, the sets are pretty basic, and at times they can even come off as cheap, but it’s difficult to fault the filmmakers for this, since they only have $20 million to work with. The non-descript near-future city in the beginning portions of the movie looks… good enough for what’s supposed to be 2079 (grungier and more developed, but not to the point where it looks like a Philip K. Dick story), and MS:1, where most of the movie takes place, looks pretty decent considering the budget limitations, though I must concede that it feels like the filmmakers not only borrowed from other movies here, but also video games. Some parts of MS:1 looks suspiciously like they were inspired by EA’s popular Dead Space game (albeit without the horror element), and I know there’s only so many ways that you can design a space station on a low budget, but still, it’s noticeable.
SkyWest, Inc. (St. George) today reported operating revenues of $921.2 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2012, compared to $866.0 million for the same period last year. SkyWest also reported a net loss of $(0.7) million, or $(0.01) per diluted share, for the quarter ended March 31, 2012, compared to $(11.1) million of net loss, or $(0.21) per diluted share, for the same period last year.
To contact home stylist Julie Cadieux:
Since I got my iPad on Monday I’ve been spending some time looking for a good game to play on it. I’ve tried out a few, but the one that I keep going back to is Towers N’ Trolls HD. It’s basically a standard tower defense game, but I’m really enjoying it. There are three difficulty settings (Easy, Normal, and Hard). So far I’ve been able to get 3 out of 3 starts on all of the levels in the first area. There are a handful of levels unlocked when you get the game (it’s free on the app store) and you can unlock more with in-game gems (currency) that you earn for killing certain units. You buy/place towers and other “units” in the stages with coins that every unit “drops” when you kill them, but some units (and some situations like killing multiple units with one shot) earn you gems. You can also use the same gems to purchase upgrades for your towers like “speed” (shoot faster) and range (shoot farther) that apply to all your units as well as other gadgets. It’s 250 gems for a new level (which includes multiple stages) or 100 gems for an upgrade and if you’re impatient and don’t mind spending real money you can buy gems in the game (a la Zynga games on Facebook). What I like about the game so far is that I don’t feel like I’ll have to spend real money to unlock new levels or upgrades if I’m willing to “grind” some of the unlocked levels a few times to get more gems. I’m sure there will be some stages I play multiple times trying to get a better score.
Aright, the rain is falling so I’m gonna get above these clouds here so now.
her second album, "I do not want what I haven't got" wasn't released until 1990, including probably her most popular hit around here, "nothing compares to you"
This project is pretty crafty, and for Valentine's Day no less (not really a holiday that warrants much decor in my book), but I think it's pretty darn cute. Maybe only because I've been breathing recycled air since Monday. (I'm afraid to open my door! Don't judge me and my wussy-cold-weather-reactions....you come hang with me this August when it's 105-degrees for 20 straight days and we'll see who's the wuss!!)
rubber band twanging
Democrats win - create a space for them to win by seeing it and then
Coworker 2: Maybe. I have a key to the other channel’s tower.
I didn't really like this one. Not when comparing it with earlier books in the series. The third and fourth books in the series just haven't excited me. It's not even that this book is 'bad' or inappropriate. It's just that I'm not sure Alvin Ho is as charming as he used to be. To me.
Being sneaky and destructive. Well no one sees me doing these alleged things I am often accused of. Everyone just assumes it was me who does the bad stuff. I mean after all, it could be Bear who eats my leashes, or digs holes or eats shoes or destroys stuffies (I could go on and on)!
Just think about it happening….
“The people have spoken” and the unbelievably obtuse,
In this light faith now abides.
B: "Mommy, that baby is crying"
So, in the end with Sanderson, I’m left disappointed in the same way that I was disappointed with the cafeteria food at my university—not because I’m not full, but because there’s a certain something about eating for getting full, a certain utilitarianism, a certain mercenary dining, which leaves me feeling that I wished I’d fasted instead. Will I finish the series? Yes. But I’ll walk away from it with the same relief I felt on the last day I ate at the school cafeteria.
However, before that happens and as their lies get bigger and more desperate, the numbers who, for whatever reason, realise they are being lied to will grow, and maybe some of them will start to fight. That, at least, affords us some comfort and a little hope that there will be a future to come after the dark period which we will soon all have to face.
I keep going back and forth in my mind about going in to detail about our problems...They are really nothing to be secretive about. I don't always like to think about our issues because I feel responsible for a lot of our problems. I feel like I have shared a million times that I struggle with anxiety. I guess I just keep bringing it up because it is a major issue for me. My anxiety not only comes from worrying about things, but more specifically, what people think about me. I feel the weight of people's opinions on me constantly. A small example that I have shared before is when I am in a drive-thru line. I order as quickly as possible and I ALWAYS have my money ready to go when I get to the window...God forbid, the person behind me would have to wait an extra 30 seconds on my account!
Or else run a half marathon interval style, which I imagine might not work so well in a long run.
This thought is as a death which cannot choose
4) to be an informed citizen.
In a large mixing bowl, whisk together the flour and eggs. Gradually add in the milk and water, stirring to combine. Add the salt, sugar, vanilla and butter, beating until your batter is nice and smooth. Heat a lightly oiled griddle or frying pan over medium to high heat. Pour or scoop (whatever you find easiest) the batter onto the griddle or pan, using approximately 1/4 cup for each crepe. Make sure to tilt the griddle/pan with a circular motion so that the batter coast the surface evenly. Cook each crepe for about two minutes per side, or until lightly browned.
Now take into consideration that the relationship between banker and customer is the opposite of the relationship between between creditor and customer. The bank pays you for holding your money; you pay creditors interest for spending your money before you get it. Transactions are less profitable for banks than for creditors. Credit card companies make big money on those irresponsible (or, in rarer instances, unlucky) enough to end up paying interest. I’ve never paid interest on my credit cards; I’ve never carried a balance except by billing error; and in fact they’ve written me a $250 check for having spent $25,000 through my main card. In other words, everything I buy via credit is 1% cheaper than the cash rate (assuming both are sold at the same rate, and it’s not one of these places that gives you a cash discount).
Blimey that got me thinking. I have been inspired by so many crafter's I couldn't mention them all.
02) Life On Mars (David Bowie)
I was startled. And thrilled. We danced one song.
I was shaking, trying to think of all the things I had touched unknowingly. There was no point.
Last week, my eldest daughter came home from kindergarten with a plastic bag full of tree cones. She had found them in the woods when the children were out there playing. She offered me to have some of them. First I didn't see a need for them. But later that evening I started to think in game terms, more specifically, in miniature terms. I thought to myself, they would be really good as trees!
The data capture process was as follows:
A well presented shop that displays all its products in an appealing way and leads customers through the shop in a stimulating environment, will sell more products than the shop with no display appeal.
1 branches
It involves a realistic touch with the tail fin, a feature that of course is optional, which does give the fly a very nice vibrant movement when retrieved. My intention when I created it was to use it for our coastal run sea trouts here in the baltic sea, but I’s proably a good fry pattern to use for big browns or any salt water fish too.
Essentially, again: ???????
BA: My goal was to be published before my son learns to read. He’s so young, but as smart as he is, it happened just in time. Now, my dream is that my books will unlock something hidden inside each reader: dreams, potential, feelings of self-worth, or memories depending on the story. I want my
When you are charged at very high roaming rates. Making telephone calls from your service provider. In this way the nolita italy fashion of that particular service provider and none else. At the nolita italy fashion and picturesque country side of Tuscany. However the nolita italy fashion along excellent cuisine and wine regions, is sure to be careful, using a cell phone on roaming when you take your US cell phone must be completed by the nolita italy fashion, allowed Italy to rebuilt its economy and to later emerge once again as a major contributor to Italy's income.
Bill: yes, with vozka
Additional Entries (leave a separate comment for each option below indicating you’ve completed the step; all entries will be verified for eligibility):
From Natural News:
1/3 cup white granulated sugar (I'd try less, maybe 1/4 cup, with the yellow mangoes)
As he was using these cups to drink a toast to idols of wood
1T grated garlic
Every week from now on I'm including links to two regular commenters on my blog in my weekend read post. It helps spread the love around and is a little thank you from me for taking the time to contribute on a regular basis. This week they are:
my love.
Areas of uncertainty and subjective interpretation must be identified and bias must be checked to avoid the creation of assumptions. In a court of law, prosecutors must prove beyond a reasonable doubt that a crime occurred to get a conviction. In this analysis, generalized probabilities and if-then statements are sometimes used to account for possible scenarios regarding this case.
2. Get a rusty screw loose. I have not tried this one but when I heard it, it makes sense that it should work. You are supposed to pour the club soda on the rusty screw and let it sit 5 minutes. The minerals and fizz in the soda supposedly will react with the rust making it easier for the bubbles to loosen the rusty sediment. If you try this you will have to let me know how it works.
But I have a little confession to make, I did not know that the company started at the hands of 1 very talented designer...Tricia Guild in 1970, and has evolved into the "Designer's Guild" that we know today. I remember flipping through a House Beautiful and running across a piece on her...and thinking Tricia Guild what a cool name, and then reading further and finding out that the surname Guild was the Guild in Designer's Guild...talk about a light bulb moment! Here is a little snippet viaWikipedia click here to read more.
Just thought it was funny and figured I’d post. Maybe I’ll ask the google gods a little more about it cause based off the Da Vinci Code, I may have just witnessed a cult meeting.
After it was confirmed by Nintendo that the Wii U won’t be more powerful than current generation consoles, it immediately went off my interest list. Why would I pay for an overpriced last-generation console when I have the new Sony and Microsoft consoles coming out 2013 with much more hardware? And besides, there are just too many PC games to even care about the console market this year with Star Wars, Guild Wars 2, Dota 2, and Diablo III.
This was the coolest game when I was a kid. For those of us that grew up watching Lethal Weapon, Starsky & Hutch and Tango & Cash, this was the only way to live out those fantasies. It wasn't a very popular machine due to the size it required, but you had hit gold if any amusement had it. First off, check the machine......
I did a post on green cleaning recipes in 2007 and over the years since then I've changed some of the things I do with my cleaning and altered some of the recipes. I give out those recipe in several of my workshops and every time I cut and paste them I tell myself to do a new post. It's time to review, edit and add a new green cleaning post.
in the life of 4 year old.
Of course we ate well while we were there. Lots of fresh Maui veggies and fish! Yum! The best fish I have ever had was at Mama's Fish House this time. We ate there last fall, too, and it was excellent then also. But this time was over-the-top! The opakapaka was seasoned and cooked perfectly and literally melted in your mouth. OMG! It makes me hungry right now to think about it! :^) And we visited Star Noodle for lunch and dinner--both great meals, as usual. Loved the Lahaina Grill, too! Didn't gain any weight, oddly enough, due to all the walking and swimming we did. I only had a shave ice once, which probably helped. Did not eat dessert at every meal. Please don't faint. I know, I know it's shocking. But I filled up on good food for a change! What was I thinking?
There are basic templates which go with the $399 fee, but I would suggest, an author considering this service, design and submit their own PDF formated print ready files. I have always been wary of publisher templates, and while there is an option to supply your own cover art and photographs—I would still suggest for the price the author is paying—they submit their own artwork at least, if not the finished PDF files.
I can't wait to see the result when I hadn't some mascara on before.
While I waited for them, at least two people who walked by me declared to their companions that they would NOT go down that thing. I don't think it was dangerous or too crazy, and frankly I wish that high speeds didn't give me such an unpleasant feeling. I wanted to go down it, but knew I would not enjoy it.
It happens in a blink, it happens in a flash
The script calls for a good deal of irrational behaviour on the part of the main characters, enough to sink many a movie. Despite that, the film still works and is pretty successful as a piece of highly strung noir melodrama. This is largely due to the work of director Lang and cameraman Stanley Cortez, between them creating a stylish and stylized visual experience. The opening segment in Mexico has a dreamy, unreal quality that perfectly fits the mood of the lovestruck Celia. As soon as the action switches to the Lamphere estate the look and feel alters too, the uneasy romanticism of the south of the border scenes switches to something more akin to the gothic nightmare that begins to unfold in Celia’s shadowy and threatening new home. It’s this aspect of the film that leads to comparisons being drawn between it and Hitchcock’s Rebecca. On the surface, there are parallels: newlyweds haunted by the spectre of the husband’s murky past, a family home where unwelcome memories seem to lurk in every shadow, and a distinctly odd household. For all that, the two movies are really quite different in essence, chiefly as a result of Joan Bennett’s characterization of Celia. Unlike Joan Fontaine’s second Mrs DeWinter, Joan Bennett is a tougher and more worldly woman. I’ve already mentioned the dark side of Celia that’s apparent from early on, but the perverse side of her character is further developed as the story progresses. A weaker, and maybe a saner, woman would likely hightail it back to the safety of the city when her husband first begins to exhibit signs of serious psychological imbalance. But not Celia; she chooses to stand her ground, whether through raw courage or her own fascination with danger, and stick it out to the bitter end. One of Bennett’s great strengths as an actress, and very likely the reason Lang chose to work with her so often, was her ability to combine feminine allure with the grit necessary to hack it in a grim world. I found Michael Redgrave’s performance much less satisfactory though. My biggest issue was that I never felt entirely convinced by his transition from the cool aristocrat to bug-eyed loon. However, in all fairness, this kind of thing is rarely especially easy to pull off. His best moment occurs in the short fantasy scene where he imagines himself on trial for murder. With a jury of literally faceless men looking on, Redgrave plays both prosecutor and defendant in the ultimate trial of conscience.
It is one of those that a company avoids, stays away from, and is afraid of. It is also one of the measures of how well a company takes care of its people.
Some of our good friends from California told us they'd be sending us a gift for Easter and that we should be home Saturday morning to sign for the package.
Tell your other fourth grade teacher friends about this post!
Flatten out the dough on an oiled surface (or it will stick) and then spread the mincemeat over the dough and distribute the apple pieces evenly across the mincemeat. Roll up the dough from the long side, tucking the join underneath. The slice across and put the the slices into a baking tin lined with baking parchment, cut side up.
In the corner of her eye, she saw a dark-clad figure. He moved through the crowd with a proud grace, smooth and haughty, with long strides. People parted before him easily as he shoved through them. He looked up at her, into her eyes, with a curious gleam, and smiled. He didn’t wave-he just stood there, gazing commandingly into her eyes.
The plot gets more involved than you might expect, with several sub-plots occurring at the same time.
YouTube beauty and makeup videos have completely corrupted me! I bought brushes (which I haven't used, except for the lipbrush). I bought colorful eyeshadow pallette (which I haven't touched, either). And inspired by one of my favorite YouTube gals, April of AprilAthena7, I fell for pale pink lip color. Lipstick, lipgloss, doesn't matter, I want that perfect, glossy, baby doll pink that looks so yummy and sweet and dainty and pretty and ultra-feminine on my lips!
Miami has some concerns going into their series with Indiana as well: for one thing, LeBron was only partly engaged in the series. When he wanted to he completely took over. When he did not care, Melo walked around him like he was a pylon. Several times, even in Game Five, LeBron would casually stroll upcourt while Wade put on a series of impossible moves. Miami is clearly at their best when the two superstar’s play off each other, which happened with much more frequency in the first three gamers of the series. The players also need to sit Mario Chalmers down and inform him how a fast break works and that he must stop settling for open three’s when they have a clear numbers advantage (“Just take it to the basket Mario!”). Sometimes a three is a good shot but every time he let the ball go I groaned. Poor shot selection has long been a hallmark of Chalmer’s game and against Indiana it could mean the difference between a win or loss.
Art is a powerful and valid form of expression, as is music and any other kind of talent. However it does not define me as a person. I am not the sum result of my work. I am the sum result of the people around me, the God I serve and what He says about me, and each day as it comes. How I treated the people in my life, how quick I am to forgive and to give and to extend grace. Those are my daily challenges.
If you see nothing immediately wrong with the phrases different from, different to, and different than, you might be surprised by all the ink spilt, keys poked and eyebrows furrowed over their respective permissibilities. Not only is different than often mistakenly called a mistake, it has been described as flagrant, eyebrow-raising, revolting, abominable, and ridiculous. More on that later. First, an introduction to the use and distribution of the expressions.
It's a tradition a few hundred years with the oil eisbock (ice bock method). You freeze the beer, scrape off the ice, and bamm you got some serious high octane beer. Imagine if you do it three or four times.
TLC approximates that she has consumed over five gallons in the last year alone.
of September, and hits retail fresh on September 21st. A real harvest beer in the season we should drinking it. Except, as Chris relates, his retailers couldn't do it. See, Fall beers come out in August, or even July. Bring a Fall harvest beer out in late September -- when you would think harvest actually comes -- and you won't find a place on the shelf -- because of the winter beers coming in shortly -- and people have already fallen into their buying pattern for the season. At least, that's the conventional wisdom among wholesalers and retailers, Chris tells us:
Waiting for my husband to come home with dinner.
Chip Reid.
I'm running a little behind on blogging this week. Each evening after work, we start trying to wrap up the final projects so we can have our master bathroom back.
See you in January!
2. In text, there is no pressure to respond within a given amount of time; one has as much or as little time as one needs to make a clear, well-supported response where any misunderstanding would be the fault of the listener, not the speaker.
The rules:
What? Nobody likes a good pun anymore?
I couldn't wait to start adding touches of Spring inside my house.
Because I read this is 2010, it's on my favorite books read in 2010 list. (see sidebar). Even tho it's a 2009 title.
What then is the fate of those who sleep? Paul appeals first to Christ’s own resurrection as a model and as an assurance of the resurrection of the dead (v. 14) and second to the ‘word of the Lord’ revealing that the dead will in fact precede the believers who are alive (v.15). As Paul describes the event of the Second Coming, he may in fact be using material that was constructed earlier and may be a rephrasing or reworking of certain portions of Christ’s own teaching (e.g. Matthew 24), hence Paul’s use of by the ‘word of the Lord’. Nevertheless, the whole section is built heavily upon the Jewish eschatological vision of the Day of the Lord[6], in which God would bring judgment to the wicked and salvation to the righteous.
Karen Susan Juday, 52, New York, N.Y.
So sorry for the absence!! Had a really good reason though!! Baby Mac arrived last Wednesday, July 13th at 9:29 in the evening!!! He was exactly 6 days past due!!! His stats were: 8 lbs 3 oz, 21 inches long. But he was soooo worth the wait!! Here's my story!!!
How often do we think that everything’s going fine, with comments such as “I can cope!”, or “I’ve got this under control!” Sometimes we need to listen to the advice of those close to us, who can see things from a different perspective. Other people are there to share the burden with us (cf. Ephesians 6:2) – we don’t have to do it all alone! We would save ourselves from becoming overstretched and burnt out, and we would have God’s peace reigning in our hearts.
There’s also a confidence piece. If you rock a dark bra under something as casual as a white vest, you either picked up what was closest to you (this might have the morning after appeal described in my post on the Smokey Eye) or aren’t necessarily dressing to impress in the first place. (Of course, you still will want to read my blog, won’t you?)
Lazarus Lupin has one of the most unique blogs I've read. Among the horror movie reviews are art and thoughts of the day. A favorite : Demon at Lunch.
The man turned and shrieked high and wild like tires skidding to and endless stop. His eyes were wide and bloodshot and his bloody fingers clawed wildly at Violet’s face and neck. Violet reached through the whipping arms to slap him hard across his cheek. The shrieking continued. Violet slapped him again and then a third time and the shrieking became a high-pitched scream like the whistle of an impossibly loud tea kettle. Violet pulled back her fist and swung hard at the man’s face. There was a crunching of bones and the scream stopped. The man crumpled to the floor, blood running freely from his nose staining his lab jacket.
voice like his, hear that accent. That music station I found that
*Share transformative meditations and strengthening prayers
The allure of black leather is so strong in Cruising, that even Karen Allen is briefly tempted by its creaking appeal (much like Det. Bayliss was drawn to leather in the Homicide: Life on the Street episode titled "A Many Splendored Thing"). Capturing the sleazy charm of the leather bar scene in late '70s New York City (the club scenes ooze authenticity), William Friedkin has made a compelling document of a period of time that will never be repeated. Sure, people still wear leather and have anal sex, but I bet they don't do it with as much gusto. No, this film is a must for anyone who loves leather, old school Al Pacino (you know, before he became Foghorn Leghorn), jock straps (especially when they're worn in a non-athletic environment), extras who nearly trip while climbing up stairs, awkward nightclub dancing, and, of course, denim vests.
You think you've seen it all. The model, named Eve, appears on the cover of the magazine's current issue alongside a 162 cm-tall (5'3") Aussie model.
I think I left it on too long. They advised me over and over not to panic as the colour deepened as it would all wash off to an all over glow in the shower and furthermore, they said it may come off on the bed sheets. I took this as an instruction to have a night’s sleep. So, I slept in the tan rather than set my alarm for 2 in the morning when it was due to come off, and I was up at 5.30 in any case.. To be fair, everywhere else is passable. Certainly I enjoy a bit of colour (however uneven) on my legs. I have also woken up with 2 (count ‘em…2!!) cold sores and there’s obviously the gum boil and chronic infection in my tooth to contend with.
Golden week in Japan, is when a bunch of National Holidays are grouped together around the same time, so most everyone just gets the whole week off. I still had to go in to work this Tuesday and Wednesday because those were not actual National Holidays. I had a three day weekend before then, and now I have the rest of the week off!
In the City of Lights, two star-crossed lovers battle a fate that is destined to tear them apart again and again for eternity.
Our 4th sponsor is...
Tonika has a special way to discern Divine Will in her life. I feel we each have our own ways for discernment. We each have our own paths to follow and though I enjoyed this book thoroughly and found it very informational, not all within it resonated with my truth and inner being.
The will in this case could not be disputed in the normal way because dad hadn't died yet.
167Her gloomy presence saddens all the scene,
unlike in our house
3. When I was in college, I rode on the shoulders of a unicyclist – while he was riding his unicycle. By the way, it part of a show in the middle of the mall food court crowded with amused onlookers. Let me just say I was set up in a big way by friends. We’ll talk about payback another time!
But it takes being willing to dive into that messy, chewy middle of things. And then, making a choice to be glad, to honor the process of transforming the feelings.
Rennie, from Edinburgh, was ordered to serve a minimum of 13 years in jail. Appeal judges have reduced that to a minimum of eight-and-a-half years before he can apply for parole.
We find ourselves staring up mountains
Toss well, taste and adjust seasonings as necessary, and serve.
Visitor’s count to Gerry B’s Books Reviews – 17,811
And then I thought: That's Nuts!
Am I downhearted by all this? Not At All. On the contrary, it's amazing the knowledge that a year's hands-on experience will give you. And expect my sister's Leek and Potato Pie on the menu sometime soon.
H - Hong Kong, Hungary
- Where's the carnival? There's a float missing its Fruits! - said the sarcy barman.
I sat on the curb and talked
The premise of Journal Spilling came about in a very organic way. That is the way I work: just by starting and letting everything spill out until I get to the heart of it, that little nugget of truth that needs to be in the high beams. The six months before the photoshoot, was spent in the process of making the art and coming up with the projects: stretching and challenging myself. I kinda did what I always do: moodle around with materials until an idea begins to emerge then jump on that galloping horse and make the art (except times 10!).
The Cast:
I bought my Curve 8520 last January from my colleague since my phone got stolen. Now, I’m not really that picky with phones or whatever, I’m fine as long as its a qwerty phone.
George sighed. Their villagers were not soldiers. They weren’t soldiers or bandits or warriors. They were farmers, skilled with a hoe and livestock, but not with weapons. An uncomfortable silence followed, but was soon broken by the sound of a fiddle. He smiled at his daughter. She surprised people sometimes. The morning continued on.
“I like the sound of that planet!” he enthuses. “And for all we know, gorillas might be the dominant species on it. If you went there as the ambassador from Earth, I’m sure they’d let you hump all the best-looking females!”
I made myself this way
She is very petite and was always on the 0 to 10% percentile for growth. We took her in regularly to make sure she was growing. She was, just on a very small scale. She was picky. I remember her as a toddler dancing around the room in her diaper and my mother saying, “She just dances to the beat of her own drum.” And it was a very true statement.
4. Spray a 9x12 casserole dish with cooking spray (get the edges too). Add in 2 tbsp. of the breadcrumbs into the dish and roll around so that it evenly coats the dish.
Thank you for all your emails and phone calls over the past few days. We're still here, picking up the pieces.
Cricut Classic Font: Sun at 3.5 inches
People don’t agree about what the object means, but they agree that it is worth being talked about. Hickey cited Johns’ Flag and that they never really decided what it meant, they just got tired of talking about it.
10. The Buff Medways - Troubled Mind
Merrell: Yes. Even though I don't have balls, it still hurts.
was one of their daughters
Anyway I'm thinking about it because I have had the craziest shamanic week! Good lord. Here's a true story from this week. I went to see the Sufi acupuncturist on one of his last days in the office space he has occupied for six years. On the way into the building I noticed something smelled good but I didn't give it much thought. When I walked in the office, the first thing I noticed is that everything was off the walls and out of the space except for the bare necessities - a couple of chairs in the reception area and a folding table, laptop, a phone. That was it. The Sufi acupuncturist was standing in reception when I breezed in. He turned to me and said, "Oh! You're wearing (some Chinese word)." I was confused. He said, "It's the scent in Chinese medicine that cleanses energy." I said, "I'm not wearing any scent." He took a step closer and sniffed me, nodded, then said, "But you can smell it, right?" I could! It was that good smell from the sidewalk. I said, "I noticed it smelled nice outside." He then went to the door to his office, leaned out into the hallway and smelled, shook his head slowly. I said, "It smelled nice outside but not in the building."
As expected from D.O who belongs to the vocal line, his biggest advantage was his singing abilities. Because he likes to sing, D.O entered all sorts of singing competitions and ultimately went through two years of training before debuting.
Who would you like to add to my list?
- Quo baked to Perfection, Twice as Nice, Endless Beauty set: 15% off
The All Action No Plot Movie Club will be there once again, catching the action as soon as humanly possible, and reporting back to the general public on what we thought.
I won three of their polishes a while ago in a giveaway and never got around to showing them, so I'll be posting them this week.
So, basically, all I want for Christmas is for that fucking song to die. To go away. To disappear and never be heard from again.
Rusty's Mom had a stroke about 10 days ago, and we returned from our Camp Ozark trip just two days into it to be by her side. Rusty was able to spend most of his time by her bedside. What a gift this was! She wanted to hang on so she could meet Ella. But she just couldn't. We spent her final days with her, and Bernadette Bacak passed away last Sunday. Losing a parent...well I have no words to do it justice...but it stinks. She was only 67. She had complicated health issues, and her body just gave out. But we are thankful for our time with her, and are missing her so much. My children are grieving with us, and Rusty's whole family, especially her devoted husband, Ray, is missing her terribly.
If you don't know by now, I have a dessert table fetish. Put me in a room with a bunch of props, some sweets, a little Adele and I am in heaven. Working on this next shoot was a serious dream come true. Not only did I work with a group of EXTREMELY talented vendors including miss Caketress herself, I had one of my best friends there to shoot it all. {Monique Simone Photography}.
and one about a peanut butter sandwich message given by my pastor
We can’t just give up our life so easily and this is NO FILIAL PIETY to our parent.
The other thing she made was an autumn clay leaf using a real leaf as the template and for detail and adding a robin, a dormouse and two caterpillars. It is now drying and she thinks she may paint it afterwards.
Let's just say when I take the final 25 to be mailed, I'll be sure to be well rested and bring a short novel to read.
Shapiro responds in part:
Here's a sample - just testing.
Over the last several years Asperger’s have become more prevalent in society. It has been talked about in the media, there are characters with Asperger’s on TV and in books and everyone seems to have an opinion on it. Some are saying it is the new ADHD and the diagnosis is being tossed around like beads at the Mardi Gra. Some even say it is made up and the kids are just brats.
“First thing” Pastor continued, “let them sleep. When they wake up, See if they need anything. Invite them in, give them something to eat, see if they need any money and let them use our restrooms”.
I have written hundreds of nonfiction articles, white papers, and other pieces over the last twenty years, and I coauthored the books (redacted) IF NOT FOR THE COURAGE is my first novel.
ADVANCED BEGINNER-Intermediate pattern. You can find tutorials for stitches by searching the internet.
Look forward to my post tomorrow morning reporting how everything went! Happy Thursday:)
Rammstein Ohne Dich D
Jury selection in Anthony’s murder trial is scheduled to begin May 9, 2011.
2.) Make (something) more attractive by the addition of decorative details or features such as blue silk embellished with golden embroidery.
I can't believe how quickly half term is going! I've had a really nice week and it's been pretty busy too! I went out for a meal with my brother and grandparents on Monday, went to my friend's house for lunch on Tuesday, had a sleepover with two friends on Wednesday, went to Cadbury World in Birmingham yesterday (Friday) and I'm going out for a curry with two friends tonight, phew! I usually spend most of my time chilling out over the holidays, but lots of things have popped up to do this week, which has been great fun!
You go to a grocery store,and you want to buy some food? Well, how about if we made it so you had to use the self-checkout to buy it? Oh, you can’t figure out how to use it? Guess you’re gonna have to starve, aren’t ya?
Every Sunday, Kara gets to visit Aunt Rachael's and play with her cousins Gabriel and Gracie. Last Friday, Gabriel got to come play at Kata's house. In this picture Gabriel is talking to Kara. They were so cute.
One of the leading actors in the movie, Xi, was played by N!xau, an indigenous San, born in the Kalahari Desert sometime around 1944 – (Biography here).
I only have one outfit to show you this week. I did get dressed in actual outfits every day, except that one day when I was sick and stayed in my jammies for 36 hours straight.
Contrary to rumors, no one was shot on Martin Luther King, Jr, Boulevard (then called Nineteenth Street). Whitman did, however, wound someone at Twentieth and University, just southwest of the Kappa Kappa Gamma sorority house, and hit another at Twenty-fifth and Guadalupe. Both of these victims were about 1,000 yards away from the Tower.
This lovely skein is available on my Etsy shop, By Our Hands. Perhaps it will add a special something to your next knitting project. There are 116 yards, 10-12 wraps per inch, in this 3.6 ounce skein.
I'm often asked how I stay organised around our home and where I find the time to blog amongst other things. Here is an ordered list of how I try to do things, so I can get on with other activities for the day:
Frankie sipped from his porcelain mug, when Tommy let out a sudden shout of surprise, causing Frankie to splutter coffee across the table.
I Am the Rebel of all Old Systems
Now, let’s be fair on two things. One, I have seen this proposal long before now on various other sites and it has come up in conversation with my friends and other sports fans. So, Schilken has seemingly written this article as a response to social media and fan inquiries. Two, the Colts are clearly struggling with much more than just the lack of Manning and their usually potent offense, as their defense has been at the bottom of the heap all season. Though, it would be very funny to see Manning get elected MVP and become the first ever player to win the award without ever taking a snap. Any thoughts?
Multinational brands that are eager to chew up a bigger share of the Indian market are spending huge sums to carefully study the Indian consumer to bring in elements that appeal to them. For instance, the latest Kellogg cereal packaging to hit shelves has created more drama around food to make it look more appealing.
Now remember, we left Wisconsin when Nathan was barely 5, Jack was barely 3 and Dallen was about 7 months. So, Dallen has never sledded, Jack has but doesn't remember it, and Nathan only barely remembers it.
15. Sexy Eiffel Towers
Tito: "Aye! Mi madre! Just look out the weendow, okay?"
Look for special features inside. Join the Circle for author chats and more.
Richard Godwin’s MR GLAMOUR and Tony Black’s MURDER MILE.
For our Top Sister this week it is:
That got her motivated to finally do something.
I am grateful that we live on a planet with such amazing food diversity and potential abundance. May all bellies be filled with healthful, tasty, filling, mouth-pleasing food.
If BN wants to correct 3 very glaring mistakes first, all the smaller mistakes might even be forgotten. How about granting (since BN has the mandate) :
So...if you have already entered the giveaway, what does this mean for you? Well, at first I wanted to withdraw the giveaway altogether and draw a line under it. But I've been persuaded that it would not be fair to penalise my readers for my mistakes, which is a completely fair point. You guys didn't do anything wrong.
While we were sitting in the cottage, out of the rain, I watched Fat Head again – the second time round hit home more than the first, so much so that Bob and I now have an agreement – with the exception of social occasions (birthdays, holidays, weddings etc), he is not allowed beer, and I’m not allowed sugar. We’ll see how that goes…..
Saarah, sounding unbelievably genuine in her response: “Because I’m tired and I want a nap.”
i come from a family that succeeds - and i feel i won't achieve success until i own my own business! - i change my mind almost regularly what i want to do for the rest of my life - and have gone to college for everything under the sun! - i don't know what my "business" will be - all i know is what i decide on, will not be "work" but FUN! - i run through business plans in my head on the regular!
"My investments are worth more everyday," Tom said appreciatively.
Anyway, the operation happens, stuff happens, Yahiro tries to take his cancer-riddled brother out of the facility, the prisoner they’re breaking out falls into a fountain, Shu voids him seemingly knowing that his void will be useful and then also knowing exactly what it does (gravity gun but not in the cool Half-Life 2 way) and how it’ll be useful despite having never met this guy before… yeah.
0092: my home
The next day I sat down with my daughter (who was a lot more critical than my son) and told her about my plan to include her and her brother in the decision making process of what foods we eat around here. This includes main meals and snacks... and of course the most important breakfast. My daughter agreed to eating eggs twice a week. In return she gets to decide on her own breakfasts the rest of the week. Generally this will be almond flour pancakes, fruit salad (with a big scoop of almond butter), shakes (coconut milk, almond butter, and fruits), homemade nuts-and-seeds-granola and such. Of course neither of my children ever turn town a couple of strips of bacon.
I don't suppose that it will have any impact whatsoever, but, what the hell, we've got nothing to lose have we?
So as we anticipate celebrating Valentine's Day (more on that origin on Feb 14th) let us take a look at the deity that has been responsible for some of the deepest loves we've ever felt.
It’s going to be expensive but I’m sure it’ll save on vet fees and make my fiends healthier. As balanced a diet as I try to give them, I cannot guarantee that they’re all eating a little bit of everything I put out for them so this is like a little insurance policy.
“Now, where we are I cannot tell,
So that brings us to ‘gassler’. It’s a slur. A newly seized genetically unaltered human and is non-gender specific. So go ahead and insult someone today, call them a gassler. The worst that can happen is they think you are accusing them of wasting too much fuel or burning up the ozone layer.
13. Action - 4:03
- Items appear here, pretty much upon request.
Why It Worked: At first taste, the Winter Wheat was way more candied orange and way less clove and nutmeg than I expected. Thankfully, the cobbler presented all of the flavors I thought were missing from the beer. Alone, the cobbler may have bordered on having too much cinnamon and mace, but when mixed with a strong wheat ale, they shared the stage and balanced both items out. The orange flavors in the beer with the apples and cranberries created flavors similar to cranberry relish / sauce on Thanksgiving day. I wasn't a huge fan of the beer alone, but the dessert pairing as a whole was a great finish to the meal.
The aims of National Short Story Week are:
If you want to preserve it for a longer period, you can add a pinch of citric acid to it.
Now usually I set two alarms. I am neurotic about waking up. I relaxed a little and what happens? Even though I checked the alarm twice last night it didn’t go off. If I hadn’t been responsible and ironed last night I would have been out of luck. In my panic I did forget it is an option to take a taxi. It would have been a bit pricey, but still an option. I have to remember that!
Marley bore this with a slight sigh.
Your share will be calculated as the number of times that the Digital Book has been borrowed during the month as a percentage of the number of times all KDP Digital Books have been borrowed, multiplied by the fund amount we establish for that month...For example, if the fund for a particular month is $500,000, your Digital Book is borrowed 1,500 times, and all participating Digital Books are cumulatively borrowed 100,000 times, your Digital Book will earn $7,500 ($500,000 x 1,500/100,000 = $7,500). It sounds lucrative, but it should be remembered that this is only an example; KDP Select is too new for anyone to predict what the actual borrowing rates will be (according to Publishers Lunch, 129 titles are currently enrolled, from top KDP authors). Also, Amazon appears to have complete discretion in establishing the amount of the monthly fund, and in deciding on "the criteria for determining which borrowing events qualify for this calculation."
Her answer surprised me. “No, not really. We ‘ve run out of space, and besides, I really don’t get too attached to places.”
Want to learn more about beautiful Renee and her parents?
This post is really only a teaser, because the challenge starts tomorrow! I won’t be posting the pictures here every day, but I will post them on my facebook page. If you want to follow my challenge, just click on the link and “like” my page.
the last time i saw Lani was 9 months ago in my brother’s wedding. the last time we spent our usual shopping and get together moments were more than a year ago. and the last time we travelled together was 7 years ago…
明日のチームへの差し入れは、
"But what if we don't even like where we're going? Why won't you tell us more? When are we leaving?" they whined.
This week's theme is "Nothing Like A Little Spook", and the challenge is : Anything But A Card
That hides its face from me its lord.
BF: That’s where they are being used and turned into controlled opposition. They are trying to numb people to the message.
We know that later that night, Judas would betray his Rabbi with a kiss, revealing his identity to the Roman soldiers who would come to arrest him. The gospels indicate that Judas had always been concerned with the financial affairs of Jesus’ ministry. Judas objected to an act of love when Jesus’ friend Mary (sister of Martha and Lazarus) poured out an expensive jar of perfume on his feet. Judas was indignant that this valuable resource could have been sold to bless the poor. And yet, for 30 pieces of silver, he handed Jesus over to those who would crucify him.
Cally's novels are aimed at women of all ages who like romance, a laugh and maybe a little cry too. Cally says, 'I think my short stories appeal to the same audience. I aim to touch the reader emotionally. If they laugh or cry I’ve done a good job. A couple of the magazines I write for have included a brief mention of my novels at the end of the story which is useful for publicity, but my main hope is that women who enjoy my short stories might see my novel in a bookshop and think, “Oh, I read a lovely short story by Cally Taylor once. I’ll see what her novel’s like.”'
“They (those terrorizing in the name of Islam) bring us (Muslims) a bad name,” Usman said. I kept silent in the time he spoke. In the confines of an old taxi the warm air came to acquire a purple welt from the lashing an outraged Muslim man meted out on the morning the death toll in the waterfront attack inflicted by terrorists from Pakistan climbed steadily towards 200.
At the farmer’s market, during the summer, you may go one Saturday and find that the berries you thought you were going to buy are no longer available. Fresh fruit is always on our list, but buying locally, I have definitely branched out on the fruits I will try.
Now, my dear sisters, that is the way with you. You are doing the best you can, and that best results in good to yourself and to others. Do not nag yourself with a sense of failure. Get on your knees and ask for the blessings of the Lord; then stand on your feet and do what you are asked to do. Then leave the matter in the hands of the Lord. You will discover that you have accomplished something beyond price…
I don’t take issue with people who want their science fiction to be pure. I was very careful to make sure my sci-fi was exactly that, SCIENCE based fiction. (We’ll reserve judgment on the FTL thing.) There’s no magic involved. If they can do things we can’t or have things we don’t, it’d because the understanding of the physical world has grown to allow us to manipulate and control with technology things we couldn’t before, or in ways we can’t now. But as a reader, so long as the world is internally consistent, heck, it can have magic AND science and unicorns and rainbows for all I care.
This was despite disciplinary internal enquiries finding them guilty of offences such as gross negligence and excessive use of force. “Of topmost concern is that in not one of the 55 cases has a single Department of Correctional Services (DCS) official been prosecuted yet,” the Initiative said.
We're not big fans of the cream cabinets that exactly match the wall paint. They had a brown and cream color platte going in this house...not very attractive! We plan to paint them white but keep the brushed bronze knobs and faucets. We will keep the counter top as long as possible but plan to remove the current backsplash and replace it with tile. As far as paint goes we've chosen a peachy color and will accent with green.
This blog has recently started using the term International Judaic as an identifying term when referring to that mysterious hidden hand that controls the wheels and cogs of satan’s world. So when you see references such as, “they”, “those”, “the global elite”, or any other obscure reference on any of the postings, then you’ll know exactly to whom and what I am referring to. The ANC government is a mere puppet of the International Judaic, and so were many of the ‘Broederbond’ leaders of the old apartheid regime!
Spread the cheese over the top and sides of the cake then press flaked almonds onto the sides. (The recipe suggested toasting the flaked almonds slightly but I forgot.)
The Academic Development Team, Academic Quality Team, Learner Development Team and (I think) E-Learning Team are co-located and work closely together.
NOW, I have to share about a fabulous store!
As close as I can figure, 25 or 26 years. 16 years ago the club was looking for a community service project, and I suggested the Christmas Family.
Denise emails me her contact information, and we get acquainted over the phone. We laugh about the coincidence that has brought our three names together under this book deal. We discuss revisions. She sends me notes. A writer friend offers me advice. You don’t have to make all the changes your editor suggests, he says. But she’s always right, I say. Denise and I work our way through two rounds of revisions. I don’t appreciate how wildly insecure I am until I experience the revision process. Denise is aware long before me. She is kind and tempered with her suggestions. She is always right.
2. “E” is the most used letter in English language.
Still another section of Calvinists would agree with the Arminians that the author is talking about apostasy. Apostasy was a real issue in the early Church particularly among the Jews. There were many Jews who had come over to the Christian faith and for one reason or another went back to the religion of Judaism. However, the Calvinists would say that those who do go into apostasy were never saved in the first place. Those who adopt this model look for a different way to understand the list of attributes found in these verses. Let’s look at the list again and see if there is a viable alternative to the Arminian interpretation:
* Special thanks — and asterisk/footnote homage — to Citizen Reader both for reminding me about the Tournament of Books in general and for pointing out that this hilarious round in the ToB was judged by Wil Wheaton — a name that sounded vaguely familar when I read it but didn’t remember until I read the CR entry that goddamn, that *is* Wesley Crusher from Star Trek TNG! I’ve read occasional references and links to his blogging but had no idea he was this funny.
Case in point, your interview with Ellen DeGeneres. You sauntered in fresh from the VMA's onto her set in what I can only describe as the most ghastly "outfit" in the history of fashion.
First of all, I get to communicate with people from all over the world, and I get to link those people together! Take one participant from the Netherlands, another from Iceland, a third from North Dakota (USA) and you have the beginnings of a very widespread artistic movement! Imagine receiving completely unique original art in the mail from the other side of the world – it’s such a cool experience!
Moskalyova and her stepfather, Igor Tsyganenkov, were camping near a river in Russia when the mother bear attacked him. It reportedly broke his neck and smashed his skull. Having witnessed the attack, Moskalyova attempted to flee but was able to run only about 70 yards before the powerful brown bear grabbed her leg and forced her to the ground.
-John McCain
Gosh I love them:
But what about those times when, no matter the size of your faith, the mountains don’t move? We have all known people, whose faith were our bedrock and our example, that landed in situations that they could not pray themselves out of. And we KNOW that we can’t pin it on their lack of faith. But what then?!
I stand and rub my arms. Even without moisture the cold of night wasn’t to be underestimated. The surface of my robe was cold to the touch and the chill had made its way to my skin despite wearing a blouse and pants underneath.
On the rare day when I have a work lunch or meeting (maybe once a month), I always feel SO revitalized to be around adults and feel part of a working community.
5. Avoid drinking hot beverages or cooking over a hot stove while wearing your baby. Babies are naturally curious and it only takes a split second for a hand to shoot out and burn itself.
The Marked and Hunger Games series. I couldn’t pick. And I’m only on the 3rd Marked book. Well, just a warning, for the Hunger Games, I’m not sure but I believe you should read it as a yound adult/teenager*. And for the Marked series, you definately have to be a young adult*. Just saying.
If last night was an example, the Atlantic Yards documentary Battle of Brooklyn is sure to spark a lot of discussion. A screening of just a half-hour of the film-in-progress was held last night at New York University’s Cantor Center, and the audience—a mix of those interested in Atlantic Yards, eminent domain, and film—had a lot of questions for the panel set up afterwards.
Which consumes me
There were two tricks to this recipe:
The letters for 'Create' are from Ma Vinci, called 'Codex' I believe. Earlier this year I chose this word to symbolize in my art as much as I can. The other stamp is from River City Rubber Works, I omitted stamping the 'create' at the beginning of that stamp. All this stamping was done using Jet Black archival ink. On the tag I also added a feathery flourish (Nature's Elements) in Cobalt archival ink.
I made it. I graduated from college.
White Square card 6 x 6
The biggest revelation I had a few years ago came at a time when I was dating someone else and that guy up and left. Just disappeared. My mother had just passed away and he took off. He couldn't handle the emotional wreck I was so he left. He took the easy way out rather than dealing with what was in front of him.
As I look at you through mine,
Revealingly, for Kombai clans, strangers are themselves referred to as ghosts, and yet such ghosts are becoming an ever more concrete reality as filming crews and adventure tourists make their presence felt in their territory. The traditions of these once undisturbed tribes have been affected by contact with the outside world, with some Korowai even now paid to offer tours.
“A competent and self-confident person is incapable of jealousy in anything. Jealousy is invariably a symptom of neurotic insecurity”, Robert A. Heinlein
Lead me to you door
the journey that forms the heart
Ben writes:What's the history of our solar system's asteroid belt? There seems to be a consensus that it's inevitable that another Cretaceous-ending-like asteroid will hit the Earth again someday; do such asteroids typically come from the asteroid belt?First, a little background: The main asteroid belt is a collection of random rocky debris found in the large gap between Mars and Jupiter. Here's a nice plot from the Minor Planet Center, the organization responsible for tracking and naming the objects. The four inner turquoise circles are the orbits of the four inner planets (Mercury, Venus, Earth, and Mars), and the outer turquoise circle is the orbit of Jupiter. Within the sizable gap between these, each green point is an asteroid in the main belt.
Since we’re begging questions, here’s another one.
And this isn’t even the only great moment in Cylinder. There’s two of them. Later on there is, if it’s ever filmed, what will be known as the greatest Russian Roulette scene ever etched in celluloid (or digitoid). It’s ten dozen kinds of awesome.
***Botox is botulinum toxin, it can be used to treat spastic disorders, excessive sweating, and of course the more famous use would be reducing wrinkles. Personally I think it is insane to inject that toxin into someone for cosmetic reasons, there have been deaths associated with it as I recall. 1mg of the toxin is theoretically capable of killing 1,000,000 hamsters/guinea pigs (I have heard of this study not seen it).
There are only three fruits native to North America: blueberries, cranberries, and Concord grapes. Legend has it that Native Americans gave blueberries to the new settlers, helping them make it through their first winter. Not completely outright offensive, but I still find it troublesome. The main issues I find with the ad:
Right you are now all up to date. As soon as this rain stops I’ll get out and take some more piccys. Quite fancy showing you bits of the North Tyne around Bellingham and then on up towards Kielder. Hmm I’ll do some research and see what I can find for you. Catch you soon xxx
Where a boy
Video highlights, courtesy of Webpresse.ca
George Harrison
Well, Chuck Taylor is basically me. All of the OCD symptoms in the book I have suffered from at some point. I actually counted how often I masturbated for an entire year (luckily that was in ninth grade and I don’t do it anymore!). All of the stove checking and the obsession with hand sanitizer – those are all things I do now. I think what people don’t realize about OCD is that people with OCD know that they have OCD. In other words, they know what they are doing is irrational and are cognizant of the fact that they suffer from an affliction, but can’t do anything about it. I find that really interesting and funny, and so for all those reasons I picked OCD as a theme for the book.
On April 9th, Rasmussen Reports, a polling organization, release the results of a poll that found that 52% of likely voters “think there’s a conflict between economic growth and environmental protection, thoough 31% disagreed." Rasmussen stated that “support for investing in fossil fuels like oil and gas is also at a new high amidst near-record gas prices and the on-going development of the Keystone XL pipeline which President Obama blocked for environmental reasons.”
Hair: Vintage Photo, Walnut Stain
Sadly some children were abused by priests. How anyone can violate a child is beyond me. It has to be a mental defect, one that requires life long treatment and tougher sentences. We need to pray for the victims, their families and the perpetrators. It is also true that some of these perpetrators were transferred by their bishop to new parishes where they re-offended. The notion that this was a deliberate plot by a pedophila ring inside the Church is outrageous. Bishops are not experts in all matters. The psychological community during the 1970's & '80s thought pedophila to be curable, the remedy being sabbatical, counselling, and reassignment. Unfortunately some bishops took that advice, tragic results followed, but thankfully it won't happen again.
“America is the greatest, freest and most decent society in existence. It is an oasis of goodness in a desert of cynicism and barbarism. This country, once an experiment unique in the world, is now the last best hope for the world,” says D'Souza.
“Enablers,” whispers K, which I suppose is some way of assuaging my Catholic guilt (not, of course, that I have anything to feel guilty about. I’ve been tottering around Boston in high-heeled boots all day in an endeavor to appear sexy and sophisticated. This alcohol is medicinal. You know, for the leg cramps).
showing that he is aroused and watchful.
For the greater part of the mass media we’re damn lucky when they restrict themselves to simply “reporting the play-by-play.” Many are outright cheerleaders, and some (eg Faux News, The Telegraph, The National Post etc) have actually put players on the field.
4.) When I was a kid, I was extremely afraid of getting robbed. Whenever my mom and I would walk around the neighborhood, I would bring “weapons.” My favorite “weapons” were my toy spade and shovel (both were plastic). Thankfully, I don’t do this anymore.
Chicken Pot Pie & Cut veggies
The big man lifted off his feet, and his howl died with a squeak. A white wad of gum shot from his mouth and flew through the air. He smacked the tile floor flat on his back.
Almost all the public statements made by BP and the Obama administration about the spill have been nothing but an endless barrage of lies. BP and the government have done the bare minimum to stop the spill and clean it up, in order to minimize the damage to BP's profits. Initially, official estimates by both BP and the U.S. government put the figure for the size of the spill at between 12,000 and 19,000 barrels per day (at 42 gallons to the barrel).
As we are experiencing the glory of the April showers this month and it seems to be raining every day we bought a really light and airy parka jacket,this slips easily into your bag and you can wear it over anything you wear. The festival look is likely to be fashion trend this summer and this is a must have if your thinking of camping or attending a festival. I teamed it with some tan suede boots which are not ideal in the rainy weather but very comfortable.
My first job was an anti-oppression, arts-based employment-training program, being offered by this youth-run, arts/media centre. After that, I worked for a local community garden, mainly taking care of the garden, weeding and planting, but also asking questions whenever I could. The last job I had been with a non-profit, Environmental Youth Alliance, as an intern for six-months. It was such a rewarding job. There were roughly 12 interns, including myself, taking care of three community gardens E.Y.A. managed in the Downtown Eastside. I learned more about the city I live in, other ways of living and eating, gardening, and how valuable community places are.
Satosar A, Ramirez NC, Bartholomew D, Davis J, Nuovo GJ. Histological correlates of viral and bacterial infection of the placenta associated with severe morbidity and mortality in the newborn. Hum Pathol 2004; 35: 536-545.
Type of Memory (RAM) DDR3
Ms. Starodub said Tuesday he had been released from hospital and was improving at home.
My Dad was a teetotaler who didn’t permit alcohol in his home - not even for cooking. But the stranger felt like we needed exposure and enlightened us to other ways of life. He offered us beer and other alcoholic beverages often. He made cigarettes look tasty, cigars manly, and pipes distinguished. He talked freely about sex. His comments were sometimes blatant, sometimes suggestive, and generally embarrassing. He spoke of homosexuality and other sexual deviances as though they were totally acceptable, to him affairs and divorce were the norm. He encouraged race-mixing and communism, even when those things were looked upon with disgust by most Whites, even the most liberal. I know now that the stranger influenced my early concepts of the man/woman, black/white relationship.
I dug into Martha's Cupcakes again and made the strawberry cupcakes. I went with regular buttercream instead of strawberry. Not being a strawberry fan (and probably the only one on earth), I felt the strawberry on strawberry would be too much! As usual, they didn't disappoint. Nick thinks these might be his second favorite cupcake ever (right behind Martha's maple cupcakes ~ yummmm).
This weekend I got quite a few blocks drafted onto freezer paper. It’s amazing how long just that takes. On Saturday evening I got only 3 blocks drafted in the 45 minutes that it took me to catch up on Grey’s Anatomy. Granted, they were more detailed blocks, but still!
And yet, in the world of global advertising and global marketing, there seems to be an irresistible gravitational pull drawing advertising and marketing decisions to the central office. This despite the obvious fact that, as a rule, people "on the ground" have a better understanding of what is needed.
If know-how is defined term in the agreement, then the grant can be a statement such as the following: “Licensee is granted the right to use the licensed know-how to make, use and/or sell the licensed products, licensed process and licensed apparatus in the territory”.
Sundown grey cloud, hunger…
The balance sheet of the film signifies its success in itself, a movie made in a tight budget of 4 cores has made 6 cores in its opening weekend and add -on of another 6 cores for satellite and music .
The seventh is the story of the maker of idols, who casts bronze statues of gods for the temples, a trade that has been handed down from father to son for generations, but the idol maker’s own son does not want to follow in his father’s footsteps, and is more interested in becoming a computer engineer.
“Meditation and spiritual practice are good, but also action. It’s very important to be clear about who you are, and also about your relation to the Earth. Develop yourself according to your own tradition and the call of your heart. But remember to respect differences, and strive for unity. Eat wisely (Ormus rich food). A lot of food is corrupt in either subtle or gross ways. Pay attention to what you are taking into your body. Learn to preserve food, and to conserve energy. Learn some good breathing techniques, so you have mastery of your breath. Be clear. Follow a tradition with great roots. It is not important what tradition, your heart will tell you, but it must have great roots.”
From administration members came three announcements that would foreshadow events to come.
After Devil’s Beard was The cliffhanger, which was a very steep yet short hill that was completely and totally smooth and slick mud. Nothing to grab, no holes, no rocks… nothing. The most common strategy was just to form a massive human chain with everyone around you, took some serious work but was definitely a fun obstacle.
In the Master Bedroom, facing the bathroom--
- Food
Edit 7: I've sent the mod a picture of myself, reddit name, date, PSU id, and the expired Kenyan residency card I received in 2010 when I first studied abroad. I am literally waiting for the sun to come up so I can run to the orphanage and tell them the INCREDIBLE news. I will take a picture with everyone (Omari will absolutely be present) and return as soon as I can.
Rebecca is afraid of the dark and hates being alone, but that is how she finds herself in the beginning of Jeff Strand’s new novella Faint of Heart. When her husband Gary takes off on a camping trip in the Alaskan wilderness with some buddies, it leaves Rebecca all by her lonesome to deal with her fears. She is coping fine until a policeman comes to her door and tells her Gary is in trouble and needs her now.
I’m on the brink of celebrating another birthday. In my family birthdays are a big deal, and I blame this on my mother and my grandmother who made everything about birthdays special, and who started the tradition of giving everyone in the family a gift on someone’s birthday.
Pest Control
Berlin Walls 2:
**It is well known that mothers are telepathic. If you have a mother, you know what I’m talking about.
So I said to Ju-Ju, - Ju-Ju, look man: There ain't no sin been committed in Credit Card Fraud. Nobody gets robbed, nobody gets hurt. The bank pays out, baby! What you got actually is a very moral act. We rob these people and the bank pays em back, so in effect we robbin the bank, y'know?!
EPISODE ZERO HAS ESCAPED...
i am supposed to have a minimum of 3 interviews but i would rather have more for the package as it is 6-8 minutes and the more audio the better i would think.
I was so happy to be able to spot the entire length of the whales and to see their callosities very clearly. It was a good day for a sighting!
Back to Flight 001- I can’t tell you how exciting it is to go to a travel shop that has items that are all A) useful, B) practical and C) pretty. These guys carry everything from amazing luggage from the Parisian Lipault company (which will be my next luggage purchase) to funky toiletries storage to a travel humidifier. I ended up with a travel toothbrush that’s self encasing and covered in stripes and a souvenirs bag that folds into itself that’s handy for when you’re perusing a market (which i tend to do quite often). There’s a couple of locations in the US, and these guys have a website that ships luggage pieces for free!!!
Virginia from Live Love DIY has a special talent. It's something that very few people in the world possess: The ability to make brown paint look like wood and not poo. I honestly thought she had stripped off the plum paint from the before chair and restained the wood, but nope! Just brown paint! Trust me on this, that's rare.
Brewdog are new and sucky and have less beer beliies but more fan-boys.
Good morning, good morning! I'm sorry, I'm a little slow this morning for my Tiddly Tuesday post! We have a new challenge this fortnight and it's and easy one! We would like to see your crafty projects using a Tiddly Inks image to say Thank You! It's always useful to have a stack of Thank You cards on hand... I find I reach for mine almost as often as birthday cards.
Then its practice, practice and some more practice. No need to practice on dumb targets or bottles, there’s plenty of crows for our benefit. If you miss, just keep practicing till you start seeing some blood oozing from your prey’s body parts. Armed and dangerous Bangladeshis should then proceed to any border town and there are many on the menu. Get a comfortable position, stock it with the essentials and start shooting anything Indian that moves. The hunt is on, it’s open season for us too. Haven’t you heard, it’s now illegal for Bangladeshis to sit idle when their fellow countrymen are being killed left, right and center. It’s illegal to be an inactive spectator and its specially illegal to feel helpless to oppression & injustice. Our elected officials are too busy lining their pockets and shipping it abroad, so stop being naive thinking that its their job. The Army is too busy making money also; check out the Trust Banks, Sena Kalyan Trust, (Destiny 2000) & the UN Peace keeping missions. I don’t want to get started with the criminals.. i meant the Police Force. They are too busy to think about lil’ ol’ you.. the common, helpless, innocent man/woman! So wake up and make your own bed, breakfast & coffee, your maid isn’t gonna clean your house for you.
She agreed when I met her outside Jamaica Hospital to give me a photo of the deceased. She said she'd first go with the children, Anthony II and Shaina, to a funeral home to make arrangements, but that I could meet her at her home later that morning.
It's one thing to fall head over heels into a puddle of hazelnut coffee, and quite another to fall for the—gasp—wrong guy. Straight-A junior Julia may be accident prone, but she's queen of following rules and being prepared. That's why she keeps a pencil sharpener in her purse and a pocket Shakespeare in her, well, pocket. And that's also why she's chosen Mark Bixford, her childhood crush, as her MTB ("meant to be").
Because it simply feels great to have the wind play with your hair.
A group of invincible ninjas in the U.S, start killing everybody, and the NYPD chief can’t solve the problem. The mayor thinks 'ONLY a Turkish detective can handle the situation', so they call for Inspector Murat (Kemal?) for help... and he comes to U.S. That’s when the action starts!
well, time for bed, it is after midnight.
that would be enough.
1/4 tsp. ground cinnamon
This post, then, is about the boundaries that women live with, and what happens when they break out of them. Some of these boundaries are imposed by society, while others arise from the dynamics of a particular relationship. Historically, women have been restricted much more than men by these forces, as well as by religion and even law. In the United States, home of the free, women could not own property at first, and it took even longer for them to get the right to vote. But the songs I am presenting here are not feminist tracts, or even political songs as such. Rather, they are personal statements by five eloquent songwriters.
The Robust Fiend is a potent foe, but is very vulnerable to alcohol. It will not attack a character who is not cold sober, or who carries an alcoholic beverage. If mead, for instance, is splashed upon it, it uses the following statistics:
One little thing I forgot to mention about Nancy Cunard--she was just a teeny-bit bat-shit crazy. And, as a commenter noted, a sense of humor was not her strong suit.
“Hey we set a sort of elections for you but if you vote,it will get only worse.If you vote we will sow more fear in your mind and terrorize your friends and family with a blackened future and with the possibility of chaos.But if you still insist to vote,it’s your democratic right,we feel the need to escort you,to make sure you won’t get misled”
I have them growing up the bird feeder too. This is the area where I pulled the moon flowers, you can still see hundreds growing in the gravel. They had almost smothered the little flower bed.
Most weeks it's a combination of both.
screaming to the bunker.
Once our ransacked bowls had been cleared away, there was talk of the D-word…dessert! I tried to graciously bow out of this round, until Mr Cyclo passed by with a tantalising tower of crispy coconut crêpes and ice cream. He paused to waft it under our noses, knowing full well that the slightest taunt would throw me over the edge, and of course I fell hook, line and sinker. We ordered the Délice de Banane, and out came a flat slice of steamed banana cake with a brown sugar crust. Just as we were about to tuck in, our man cried “halt” and began spooning over the pool of sweet coconut milk it was swimming in. He explained that this would enhance the flavour and was, of course, spot on. I could have eaten the entire cake tin just drenched in the stuff.
250 gm grap leaves (I used frozen "Farm Frites" leaves one of the best brands)
Cook bacon in a skillet over medium high heat until crisp. Remove bacon with slotted spoon.Remove all but 1 tablespoon of bacon grease. Toss shallots in skillet and reduce heat to medium low. Cook about 10 minutes until brown and caramelized adding the garlic after the first 5 minutes. Add the wine, increase heat to medium high and cook until there is no liquid. Remove from heat and add 2 tablespoons butter.
I'd rather do without these frankly, though something traditional and warming would be fine.
for the x that marks the spot
But then I think, I am an illustrator not a writer fer chrissakes! If my pictures cannot express how I feel there's really no use in looking for words. So please excuse my platitudes! I think - or at least hope - I am much better at expressing my thoughts with my pictures than with words.
Dear Pushy Lady on the Subway,
Another method… which I really recommend you do not try at home… is to have a stroke in your left hemisphere. This is what happened to a neurologist called Jill Bolte Taylor, and although she was seriously ill, her life was in danger and she needed intensive hospital treatment as a result, the experience of the injury was an amazingly positive life-changing one, see: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UyyjU8fzEYU. The simplest and safest way to activate your right-brain and to disarm the attacks against it from Illuminati-controlled society is just to be aware of its presence and to trust it. This was the most important thing Ian taught us at Shift 2. I think that the right-brain gives us hints, a little dig in the ribs every now and again that is just its way of saying: “Don’t forget, I’m here.” The synchronicity and premonitions we discussed are a part of that. A time is coming when we may not need to use the arduous above activities because of changes going on in the universe around us, which is in turn affecting the sun and the Earth. This all ties in with the 2012 phenomenon that Ian also explored. A couple of years ago Ian took a trip to Peru to meet with a tribe of Indians called the Quero. These were a tribe that everybody had assumed were wiped out by the Conquistadors in the 16th Century, but in fact they just went underground, living mostly in secret settlements high in the Andes mountains and keeping away from the general population. For some reason they decided to go public in the early 1960’s and reemerged from their hiding place to the astonishment and delight of their fellow Peruvians. While he was in Peru Ian fell down the stairs and broke his leg; I remember seeing him still limping at the 2010 Glastonbury Symposium, see: http://hpanwo-tv.blogspot.co.uk/2010/07/ben-goes-on-tor.html. But this worked out for the best because he couldn’t go climbing with the rest of his group and so was free to wait at the bottom of the mountain and talk to the Quero Indians who found him there, in the true way that these incidents manifest themselves synchronistically. The Quero believe that in 2012 to 2013 the sun will go into a massive overdrive of activity that will cause it to bathe the Earth is solar flares. This will do terrible damage to electrical and electronic equipment that could take years to recover from; but, on the positive side, it could free us from the control of our right-brain by the Illuminati, so making their New World Order impossible. The legend the Quero speak of is shared by many indigenous tribes throughout the world. The Maori of New Zealand call it the “unveiling”, this is the literal translation of the Greek word apocalypse; not “end of the world”, but “unveiling”. It all fits into place! We can see now why the Illuminati agents in the Conquistadors were so desperate to commit their evil genocide on the American Indians, just like the Holy Inquisition did to witches in Europe during the thousand years previously. And that brings us onto the next interesting fact: The Vatican has just set up the first ever office of the Holy Inquisition anywhere in the world outside Rome… in the city of Lima in Peru, right on the doorstep of the Quero. Could the Chemtrails be an attempt to stop the positive effects of the solar flares reaching the Earth’s surface and so preserve Illuminati left-brain rule? I’m not sure; there are a lot of unanswered questions over Chemtrails and their true purpose, see: http://hpanwo.blogspot.co.uk/2007/10/chemtrails-and-tomorrows-world.html. However Ian feels confident, as do I, that these attempts are futile and will fail. I’m glad I went to a Shift 2 event and I’d recommend them to everybody. Ian’s done a good job striving so hard not just to present them, but to do all the donkey-work as well. We left in high spirits. Both Ustane and I were inspired and filled with hope. Ian exudes a sense of optimism that cannot be found in any other researcher, even his runner-up David Icke. It was tiring to sit there for six hours taking in all that information and processing it in my brain… both hemispheres of it… , and my bottom was very sore afterwards, but I do resonate with what he was saying. I’ve noticed this in my own life since I was discharged from the Hospital Portering Service. Things have been working out for me very well, see: http://hpanwo-tv.blogspot.co.uk/2012/04/tv-guns-and-lawyers.html. Along with my housecleaning business I’ve been offered a job as a columnist in a new UFO/conspiracy magazine, of which I’ll post details as soon as they’re available. I’m also going to edit the magazine. Ironically if I were still in Portering I probably wouldn’t have the time. So now we know that clouds do indeed have silvery linings, and why they do.
How will you change the world if God can’t change your heart?
Maybe I’ll start counting from here on out too.
If the men England shot were his father’s murderers or accessories, that would change everything. Somewhere during the past few years, after reading of widespread vigilante justice in New Orleans, I wrote that I had no problem with someone killing the murderer of his loved one. If the law enforcement and criminal justice authorities are worthless, citizens have no obligation to defer to them. Such obligations are conditional.
By Louis MacNeice
Today I received, in the mail, a box full of wedding dresses with which I am to sew clothing for babies who have died. The patterns start at 18 weeks.
"I hate ribs."
We will remember...
Some important and personal issues need to be attended to as I take a
This is also an example of how a miniature setting can be created with items typically found around the (full-sized) house, a special dwelling does not always have to be created, just re-purposed. A spare bookshelf or an empty cupboard or crate, or any number of other containers may work just fine.
Their first post won't be until May 4th, but they are already working on their creations and you will be dazzled!
DERRY, Northern Ireland – Anguished screams, mournful wails, and fear-filled cries greet visitors to the Museum of Free Derry. This small, emotionally powerful museum chronicles the city’s role in The Troubles, as presented by those who lived in the Bogside neighborhood and experienced the conflicts, riots, and marches conducted in the name of civil rights.
Sbrisolona: Dessert of the year?
The Atlantic Yards deal is one of those “economic-development/urban-planning” projects Anderson wants to protect — but the public purpose of the project is not actually clear.
The thinking behind this purchase is really because I don't want to overcrowd my house. No offense, but I've seen other people's house with baby or babies, it seems their space is being monopolized by babies stuffs and I have two infants to boot ya know so in a sense I should really have double of everything right?. So at 4 months old I bought these bebePods Plus for them to learn to sit and hoping they can use them as high chairs so I don't have to buy 2 brand new high chairs so soon. They came with a tray and mat as well as the toy that you can attached to it. As of now at 6 months and 1 week old, these chairs are attached to our dining chairs. I do however have concern that once they get bigger these chairs won't fit them anymore and I will end up buying high chairs THAT soon if you know what I mean? But I will think about it when that time comes. Oh..there is one thing that I don't really like...the mat as well as the toy that you can attach to the tray, turned out to be quite annoying. My babies can pull them out so they play with it, drop them to the floor and making mess haha.
Joseph trusted God as he lived his life. Was this God’s plan for him? It was God using what happened to Joseph that revealed his plan in the end to save many people alive. Joseph lived his life and God used it. Joseph didn’t chase God nor was he driven by purpose; he just lived his life
Screams from the haters, got a nice ring to it
First, while Descartes is correct in his claim that the senses deceive us in some cases, his general skepticism about the senses is not warranted. That this is so is shown by the following argument. In order to make his case, Descartes presents a variety of examples in which he has found that his senses deceived him. To be justified in claiming that the senses deceive, a person would need to be able to recognize when an error has taken place. In other words, the person would need to be able to distinguish between being mistaken and being correct. For example, to know that the ‘heat mirages’ that occur on paved roads are ‘deceptions’, one would need to know that they are optical illusions and hence what is seen is not what is actually there. But, in knowing this, one is able to see through the deception and thus avoid being deceived. Ironically, it must be concluded that in presenting examples of how the senses deceive, one is also presenting examples of how we are able to ‘see through’ deceptions-thus undercutting the very claim that is being argued for. Ironically, in arguing that he has been deceived by his senses, Descartes also argues that we can see through such deceptions.
OK, now the all important roll call - much more interesting. A quieter week in the playground - nobody ventured near those pogo sticks, and nobody (no names) decided to have a swim in the duck pond!
What a month it’s been. The week after the flood, I was kinda just feeling shellshocked, although I hadn’t actually DONE anything but sit here at the computer catching up on all the news in between periods of working. I kind of drifted off to Facebook for an evening on the following Monday, I think, and got into digging thru old high school photos various friends had posted, after having spent about 15 hours straight reading flood-related updates on Twitter and the Web. Feeling guilty the whole time, because I could get away from it all for a little bit while so many people I know couldn’t. Because they were right there in the middle of it.
She grinned back at him. “Damn right he is.”
As we draw nearer to meeting Nora, I’ve made it a point to really savor these next 23 days. I refuse to let them be ruined by the fallacy of my imagination.
Tweet: "Follow @nav_beauty and RT this to enter Navilicious Beauty's 1st Birthday Giveaway! Details here: http://goo.gl/HFRFL"
faults, and go on with us, we pray Thee, till Thy great work shall be
“I’m not much of a gusher, so I won’t gush, but have you ever met someone who just fit? Someone who makes you feel like you’ve known them all your life in the first five minutes after meeting? I did. This person is refreshingly kind and has the most thoughtful eyes, and no matter what happens between us I will always think of them and smile.
All wonders in the mind
"Look at the state of you?"
We positioned ourselves in the most central place available on that rainy San Diego night: the giant hotel jacuzzi.
A simple reply, "Yes."
Some drawings, made
Amanda X
physio last friday. really hopeful to get thumbs up.
Entertaining
Father, forgive me for walking with the spirit of fear. Fear of the responsibility of carrying your Glory to the fullest. Heal my heart Lord of past attempts to see your glory manifest and they did not manifest because of the condition of my heart. Renew my belief system. In Yeshua’ (Jesus) Name.
'I'll write to you.'
Distilled water to fill your bottle.
RAMON JM, MORCHON S, GENE M, FONT C, RAMIREZ M. Cobertura de la vacuna antigripal entre un colectivo de trabajadores sanitarios de un hospital de tercer nivel. Vacunas. 2003; 4: 69-72.
For all the film's strangeness - the mysterious blue box, the creepy old couple, the monstrous homeless person, the masturbating and crying, the Hollywood cowboy at the incongruous corral in the middle of the city (a corral that actually exists in the hills below the Hollywood sign) - the most striking memory I have of the first time I saw Mulholland Dr. is simply of Naomi Watts. I was not familiar with her work up to that time, so for the whole first half of the film I wondered if she was even a serious actress. Betty from Deep River Ontario is such a cornball you're not sure at first if you're supposed to take her seriously, but then a little over an hour in she goes to the audition opposite Chad Everett and suddenly she's an entirely different person. That for me was the moment in history when Naomi Watts arrived and I thought, "Wow. This girl can act." In a perfect world, that performance would've been recognized with an Oscar nomination, but we know the world just doesn't operate that way and neither do the Oscars. That's why we have The Muriels.
Read: 1 Thessalonians 5:12-18
This was the first really successful project I made. I still have it, I still love it and I still think it is great. I may make more, who knows.
The governor of Puerto Rico and other officials there have asked the FCC to reverse a decision they say will leave the territory without sufficient access to broadband for too long.
THEY WANTED A SMALL, ENSLAVED POPULATION TO PAMPER THEM
It could also be that you had been brought up in an environments where controlling or many rules and regulations, punishments at homes or schools, lack of attentions, harsh words and hard disciplines, drunken fathers, mothers or other authorities, work oriented but no real expressions of emotions by families, no crying allowed-especially for boys (male/man don’t cry) or even to girls, no feelings allowed to expressed, living under order, demand perfections by authorities, when all these things are more practiced or valued and is the lifestyle rather than unconditionally loved by parents or authority figures then many side effects can come upon the life of a child. It is in words and in lifestyle; we might be able to say, ‘my father loves me unconditionally’, ‘my mother loves me unconditionally’, ‘my authority figures love me unconditionally’, but, if the lifestyles are more of what we wrote up there, then it is not unconditional love. The children of missionaries, pastors and servants of God are often told, “You are pastor’s child, you must not behave like this”, those things created frustrations, anger, performances and many more in a child’s life. Remember, we live in a fallen world, where no one’s born perfect, where Jesus Christ need to come and save the world, not just to save us from going to hell, but to heal us and deliver us as we saw in Isaiah 61. (Isaiah 61 is given in the last part of this page).
- 3 chocolate bars
Before I wear the crown so I won't forget
Just leave it to Asian to show you that no great feat should go unnoticed or under appreciated. I’m not sure why we are so capable of combining such a strange combination of seriousness and comedy but we do it well that is for sure. Let’s not forget the essence of strange involved in linking the two things to begin with that leaves people including myself the same thing every time. That question is a simple “What?”. What is going on here? What did I just read/hear?
Most of my ambulance shifts I'm paired with a medic that prefers to tech all the calls, so I don't have much I can report on there either.
Or you can get a contemporary combination of roasted and diced pineapple jelly with lime zest in a glass. Or you can get the irresistible looking pineapple-flavored bonbons. And, if you want to go all the way with your decadent tendencies, they offer a wine or champagne accompaniment. Genius.
If you come early, the bus is late. If you come late... the bus is still
So my plan for tomorrow is to take a gamble on life---
The NHS acknowledges that the trans community as a whole has one of, if not THE highest suicide rates of any group within the NHS. That and self-harm. Strangely, allow someone to transition, and that rate swiftly evaporates.
Liberal churches and denominations are joining the project, some more quickly and eagerly than others. The cultural pressure is formidable, and only churches that are truly committed to Scripture will withstand the pressure to accommodate themselves and their message to the new morality.
Boulder - Liquor Mart
Flying VFR to Cedar Key from parts north hardly mitigates a traveler’s sense of the place’s remoteness. Although a three-mile causeway connects the key to the mainland, Cedar Key remains an island in every sense of the word. Pilots may cross only a few miles of that sectional-chart blue that quickens a single-engine driver’s pulse, but for a good 30 minutes before that, the green parts of the chart are little better; it’s a decidedly unsolid type of green. In every direction the verdancy of a vast marsh furnishes aviators with splendid vistas but little peace of mind.
LEGALAFFAIRS@STARAIR.US
As usual, Jodi Picoult comes up with a very interesting and controversial topic for a book. A mother whose child is born with osteogenesis imperfecta, or brittle bone disease, sues her doctor, who is also her best friend because the doctor failed to find out that her child had the disease until it was too late to abort.
Good morning all.i hope you are all well.its wall to wall sunshine so far this morning.do you think i should tempt fate by pegging the washing out.lol.
In Maggie Stiefvater's Shiver, Grace and Sam found each other. In Linger, they fought to be together. Now, in Forever, the stakes are even higher than before. Wolves are being hunted. Lives are being threatened. And love is harder and harder to hold on to as death comes closing in.
It's hard to know exactly what can be done to improve executive functioning skills in young adults and the problem is twofold;
So the drunkard Ransome
Do you do that?
Everyday is becoming a difficult day... I think I barely have patience to cope anymore and have realized some of the most drastic changes in my attitude this pregnancy!
Perhaps all these days
Cairo, February 2nd 1915
Preheat the oven to 350 degrees F.
So, the First Priority in True Biblical Discipleship should be focusing on the Gospel and the reality of the New Birth
With little or no experience, you can work in a pet supply store, meeting all kinds of dogs and learning about dog products. If you are interested in working behind the scenes, try a dog food company or toy manufacturer. Depending on the rules of the company or store, you may be able to bring your dog to work.
Note also that people can comfortably spend time without talking. That speaks, too. Note also that conversations that provide information but don't add interest and character development might be better dealt with by saying, "Between hiccups, she gave him a disjointed account of her adventure. With comforting noises, he wiped her nose with no sign of impatience or confusion despite her digressions into incoherency." I can go through the dialog, but, if my readers already know, I'm not contributing much.
Inscrivez votre e-mail pour recevoir des notifications lorsqu'un nouvel article est publié.
Savard: I’m telling you. Who’s in goals, What’s on left wing and I Don’t Know is the center.
Rub ribs with paprika, garlic powder, and chili powder. If you have time, refrigerate after rubbing for 1-3 hours. Zest oranges and lemon. Juice oranges and lemon, adding juice to the slow cooker. Crumble chipotle and add to slow cooker. Bring ribs to room temperature if you refrigerated them. Brown each half of the rack of ribs on both sides in a heavy skillet. Add first half to slow cooker, pour a little barbecue sauce on top, then add second half. Add beers, then top off with more barbecue sauce. Add about 3/4 of the bottle of barbecue sauce total. Ideally ribs will be just submerged in liquid. If you have time, cook ribs for 10-12 hours on low. This way they will be most tender. If not, cook for five hours on high. Remove ribs from liquid (discard liquid), serve with the rest of the barbecue sauce and hot sauce.
Overall: 9.5 / 10 I really really like those lenses!! Maybe they are not as vibrant as the advertisement photo in real like, but in flash photos they really do stand out!
**We had this conversation the other night and it got Lance and I both tickled!
Here's the trailer.
I been looking for 20" hair extensions for a long time, and finally found them at Sally's!! they were super cheap XDD
so little lately ! Hope everyone is well and still enjoying your crafts ! I have decided to get my hook and wool out again this week , and i know once i start it will be addictive as i just cannot wait until the item is finished ! The green blankets always proved very popular , so i may start there !
I keep thinking today is Friday.
For those interested in more engaging events, check out ABC Radio’s The Future of Conferences and Planeta.com’s guide to Green Events which for many years has espoused parallel conferencing: “Please, no more closed door meetings that do not include an opportunity for a virtual dialogue among interested parties before, during and after the event. Interested constituencies without the money or time to attend in person should have the opportunity to participate.”
One of my favorite crafting hobbies to do is embroidery, particularly cross-stitch and simple outline embroidery. For a simple project, I like to find patterns at my local craft store. On a recent trip, however, I felt pretty let down by the selection: my few choices were either American flags emblazoned with eagles, 'Oriental' ladies with tigers, or the kind of wolves usually screenprinted onto t-shirts. Not exactly the romantic and sweet fare I'd been picturing for a leisure activity! Even the unicorns managed to look a little trailer park for my tastes. What I really wanted was a few lolita-worthy but doable dose of cuteness.
This was my first Mo Manning image and since last year I only had the time to make one card with it just thought I'd use it again. The image is called Christmas Morn and I love it to bits!
~Rid myself of my "beginner" vintage and replace it with a better wardrobe, complete and best fitting my needs.
Other: Watercolor pencils, blender pen
I found a Croc in the woods in the lot next to us last fall and ventured in once the colder weather came. I also have an old pair of Crocs that I broke. All three of these have been in the garage over the winter, waiting for me to do something with them.
Structural design patterns
At Car Seat Recycling Day, seats older than 6 years old, purchased at a garage sale or thrift store or involved in a crash will be collected and dismantled to be recycled and disposed of properly. Safe Kids Wood County will be participating locally from 9:00 am – Noon at Marshfield Fire Department, 514 E. 4th Street, Marshfield. There will also be Safe Kids events held at Kohl’s Department Store, 3600 Rib Mountain Drive, Wausau and Kohl’s Department Store, 150 Crossroads Drive, Plover on the same day and time.
WG: Okay, so I just want people who read the blog to know a bit about how you live. What car do you drive?
I love roasting whole chicken. When we decide to do it it’s because we’ve settled on the idea that tonight is a cooking night. And that’s a good feeling. Typically we’ll put a movie on, sip some wine, and just enjoy spending time together working on Food. Actually, one of very few things we create together. Sure, we’ll talk about breaking out the trumpet and banjo, respectively, and holding a jam session, but to date we haven’t actually done that. Cooking together is ours. And it’s nice.
She has no social skills whatever and appears to be somewhere on the autistic spectrum, his social skills are perhaps a little too good as he has several children by different women. When we meet him he is recovering from a vasectomy.
i was somewhere in between
6. Your choice (3:50)
I finished my Laminaria!
But leave that aside. The site goes on to say this:
Another lamb for the feast. Not likely. Jezebel knows that taking a bite out of the virgin bait the demon slayers have tossed into the club is a bad idea. But there’s also more than one way to skin a proverbial cat, or in this instance, pop a slayer’s cherry before she causes any problems. There’s nothing in the succubus rule book that says Jezebel has to play fair. After all, she need only suggest. What the slayer does with the nudge is up to her.
On a spiritual and cosmic level, an ‘electric Universe’ — via our planetary umbilical cord to our star; its energetic tie to Galactic Center and through it the galaxy’s electromagnetic relationship with all other galaxies and the most distant stars — can be viewed as a purposeful whole, held together by plasma ropes, braids of light and power transmission lines which do indeed transmit information.
Hey, It’s Jet Here.
The race started through Universal City Walk and that was really, really neat! Universal City Walk is a dedicated to the movies, so there was Godzilla and King Kong and all these other movie monster recreations and super huge neon signs towering above until you hit the streets of LA which aren’t nearly as entertaining to look at!
He's 70 years old.
You have to be careful what you talk about while you're still snuggling in bed with the Sunday paper. I mentioned greens, merely because I think our diet could use some healthin' up. Cranky was all, like, "Bang! Wow! Done." Still, largely, nothing wrong with that.
R – Yes, but on the other side of the argument, we didn't want to lead people down plot routes that might end up changing radically in subsequent drafts; we didn’t know if that would be fair to them. Or to let them become invested in characters that might have to be altered or cut.
are quite capable of finding our way around the rules. No law is stronger
Miss Catie weighs 4lbs, 6ozs and is measuring right on!
To make this an even more special month I am also going to give some lucky reader a Mulberry Muse secret surprise package of assorted Tea Time related cards and gift tags.
Apparently the trick is to reduce centrifugal advance to 20 degrees and make initial 15 for a much peppier engine. I did my best to limit centrifugal advance by making as bushing to limit advance and then reset timing. A test drive didn't reveal any pinging and the Lincoln was much happier. All by eye ball and seat of the pants need to track down the correct distributor cam or buy a digital calliper to set exactly.
That’s enough for tonight. I hope you’re all doing well, and thank you for coming back to see what’s up. I know I’ve been slacking on updating my blog on a daily basis here, but there is a lot happening in my life right now, and I’m enjoying the ride. I’m almost ready to take that step into the rest of my life.
We greeted her cousins when they came home from school. Nikohl and Nate just adore Amelia and she just loves her cousins!
Well, my goodness, here it is only four days until the Spoutwood May Day Fairie Festival, and I haven't said a word about it! I didn't even invite Mushu and Grape, last year's most popular dragons! I haven't gotten out my garb ... The only thing I did was to put the Mountain Tribe banner in the trunk of the car (fearing I would forget it).
1 upheavals
Immortals by definition means beings that cannot die, regrettably, this movie will be dead in my mind by next Tuesday. Although memorable wouldn’t be a word I could associate with Immortals, there are some genuinely cool aspects to the movie and it does have its moments.
2nd Course:
The tomb suggests that Judas Thomas was his son and not a brother or friend. They theorize that Thomas kept his family ties a secret so that his family would be safe. He didn’t want the Jewish or Roman officials trying to kill his wife and kids.
You can be the winner of this amazing kitchen appliance: The Hamilton Beach-Set n’ Forget 6 quart Programmable Slow Cooker with Lid, Click-in-Spoon, and thermometer probe. Don’t know what to cook in this wonderful Slow Cooker? I will throw in “Not Your Mother’s Slow Cooker Cookbook” by Beth Hensperger.
I'm just following the road and don't have a clue where it is leading. I like that.
The Prosecutor failed to prove that Charles Taylor was the guiding spirit behind the rebel groups in Sierra Leone. It even failed to prove that the troops from Liberia that joined the insurgents in Sierra Leone were under his control: ‘the Trial Chamber finds that even if they were sent to Sierra Leone by the Accused, there is insufficient evidence to find beyond a reasonable doubt that they remained under the effective
Below, US public pension funds, under fire for the sustainability of their defined-benefit plans, are increasingly opening a new social-media front line in the battle to influence public opinion. Good for them, hopefully Canadian DB plans will also use social media to influence public opinion on what's in everyone's best interest for a proper retirement.
51
Me, Mom, Kelsie, and Nicole (sister-in-law) decided to make a fun girls trip out of it. We left the day before the appointment to do some shopping, eat out at a nice place, stay at a hotel, and just be away from our guys for a night. It was truly a blast. Here are some pics!! (excuse the blurry pics from my phone)
Lee Min Ki as Ma Jo Goo
2 garlic cloves (minced)
Tell us about what you sell:
I don't have to create perfection. I just have to grow and learn as I create.
15K - 9:45 pace
May 5th around 11 pm I was getting ready for bed and was walking out of my bedroom into the kitchen when all of a sudden I lost my balance and before I could do anything I was flat on the kitchen floor face first. The way I fell I hit my forehead with all my weight on the tile floor which kind of snapped my head back. Now, I have had two surgeries on my neck, one being a fusion, so all I could think was 'what have I done to my neck?' My husband came roaring up the stairs and there I was on the floor bleeding all over. Turns out the force of the blow cut my forehead, actually there is a dented spot there now. He and my nephew, who was staying with us, got me up off the floor. The cut had pretty well stopped bleeding and I was able to move okay and felt okay so I convinced them I did not need to go to emergency. My husband bandaged up my head and everyone went to bed. About 2 hours later I woke up and was having some trouble breathing so I got my husband up, told him I needed to go to emergency. By then my breathing was very labored, sounded like a bad asthma attack. We went to emergency which is only about a 5 minute drive from our house but by the time we got there I no longer was breathing and was blue.
I hate don’t you, hate it when you have a precious day off and yet tired though you are, you awake at the same time you would for work, your body fatigued, yet your mind akin to some cruel taskmaster denying the body much-needed sleep. You will of noted from my last post of course my complete and utter loathing as to the plight of man in this area, that is to say toiling constantly to fill the coffers of the treasury who themselves tax us to pay the money-powers. I fully realise that my toil is almost in vain and that my body aches so that others may gain, those others the newcomer, the shiftless, the duplicitous politician and the banker.
I think I'm on vacation.
Alignment: The entire webpage is aligned in the middle of the background. If you scroll down to the bottom of the webpage you will see how the content of the webpage only stays in the cente and to the left and right of the webpage is the blank space of the background.
And as if that wasn’t enough excitement down at my local Wal-Mart, I had a customer I hadn’t seen in a while. This young man wears a kilt. He told me once he wore it as a costume and found it to be very comfortable so he now wears a Black Watch Kilt most of the time. As I first saw him tonight he was close to the counter so I could only see the top half of him, I caught just a glimpse of his sporan. I then looked at his face and recognized him and greeted him saying I hadn’t seen him in a while. Your Sunday night Wal-Mart crew is very friendly and if you are a regular or stand out in any way we will remember you. We have a couple that comes and walks laps in the store most nights as we are five acres under cover. It wasn’t busy tonight when they were in and as they came along the line of registers you could here the cashiers calling out greetings and brief exchanges. I really do like my Wal-Mart job. So oats and kilts at work, not bad.
That bus you boarded at Trafalgar Square is run by a German company. Boots fell to the Italians in 2007. Selfridges, Fortnum & Mason and the Savoy are owned by Canadians; Harrods has been bought by a firm based in Qatar; the Dorchester by one based in Brunei. As for our airports, most of them are now run by a Spanish firm.
Housefather said Tonchin is well aware that Côte St. Luc has been in favour of the link for more than 10 years, and that the city and TMR pushed to have it as part of the agglomeration’s transport plan.
Accidents can happen. Photos of damaged and destroyed turbines. Nuclear plants can have accidents too.
we’ll compare and make a choice”, or “I only can afford a premium of $900/year,
Mary Battle is a PhD Candidate at Emory University’s Institute for Liberal Arts. Her email address is marypbattle@yahoo.com.
Although a very short novel, it took me a while to read. Most likely because the plot was something so very different from what I am used to, and also because of the language.
from his bed to the porch, in my arms.
Conductor: Ulf Schirmer
A concert of all concerts on Feb. 11, 1970 in New York at the Fillmore East. This was a partial rendition of the late show that night. 30+ minutes of sure bliss……….God Bless Bill Graham and long live the hippies!
Reading level: Ages 18 and up
"The recent 5% increase in beer duty on top of the 20% increase experienced over the past 2 years is unhelpful to the brewing and pubs industry and will put further jobs at risk across the sector. While we remain cautious about the trading conditions that we expect to experience in 2010, we remain committed to giving our customers good reasons to visit our pubs and drink our beers. Therefore, we intend to increase investment in the marketing of our brands and will continue to invest selectively in our pub estate.
Good question. A WIP is a UFO that is being actively worked upon. A WIP becomes a UFO when it sits idle, untouched, maybe even forgotten, for a fairly long period of time. The length of time varies from knitter to knitter and is totally arbitrary. My standard is 30 days. If I haven’t worked a single stitch on a WIP in the past 30 days, it magically morphs into a UFO.
One of the best selling books today is A Course of Miracles. From it I quote; “There is no sin. A slain Christ has no meaning. The journey to the cross should be the last ‘useless journey’. Do not make the pathetic error of “clinging to the Old Rugged Cross.” The name of Jesus Christ is but a symbol…it is a symbol that is safely used as a replacement for the names of all the gods to which you pray.” It is a best seller.
When GMP did finally pass a file on Girls A's rape to the CPS the following year, a Crown lawyer decided not to charge anyone because he said she would not be a sufficiently credible witness to put before a jury. A second CPS lawyer backed that opinion.
Keeva at Tree Bark Jacket wrote a very good post about the difficulty in finding a group of people to raid with. I think she fairly well sums up what a lot of people are saying about various aspects of the game right now. Whats wrong when people are dissatisfied is very often not the game, its the people playing it. When it comes to raiding, you need a group of people in order to succeed. You can either pick those people at random each time, which often leads to problems because the attitudes and level of ability of those players will vary widely, or you can raid with a guild.
Today's page features another vintage photo. This isn't really a Christmas themed photo, but I really liked it and it made me think about all those folks who celebrate their holidays in warm climates:
“I say skip the grave dirt and buy the eggs at the grocery.” I took another swig of beer.
Conclusion: Whatever shape it was, there was probably some dancing on it.
SPCK: 2011
Some time has passed since I read the Twilight series, and I’ve gained perspective. I.e., I realize that Edward is a creepy old vampire man, Bella is a nitwit, and Jacob should keep his shirt on. I understood that no, it’s not romantic for Edward to watch Bella while she sleeps, it’s stalkerish.
I've also learned the best way to reheat leftover pizza. Leftover pizza was never a problem when TBHITW was here.
Who is calling? My Savior.
Just so you guys know, I haven’t forgotten about live Saturdays. The past few weeks have been pretty draining and I’m having a hard time pulling myself together. I guess it shows in the frequency of my posts. In any case, I’ve got a great video for today. I know I wrote about this album before, but the Roseland NYC performance is simply legendary, and it’s, to my eyes, even more impressive and charming than the studio material Portishead issued throughout the years.
Can see you how much clearer the picture is?
Leanne invited suggestions for nailart and I thought album covers! Specifically this one (see below). Such a shame vinyl is dead because the covers were works of art. (Cue a series of fave album covers.)
I will be replying to emails as soon as I can, please bear with me.
It may sound like I’m being critical but these are all details schmetails. I really did LOVE this movie. The Cuban Missile Crisis scene is fantastic and the cameos by Hugh Jackman and Rebecca Romijn were brilliant.
Speedball or Airball is the design custom paintball jersey it will help to determine what it is about features, price points are Tippmann Alpha Black to the design custom paintball jersey a search engines research of realistic paintball guns. These guns are typically cost effective, dependable, lightweight, and easy way for anyone to get a massive quantity of players away right from paintball. Although realistic paintball markers known are stock paintball guns, which are ideal for beginners. The best piece of property to open the design custom paintball jersey what you're getting into before you meet and you will wear at the design custom paintball jersey for the design custom paintball jersey. As paintball involves lots of running, diving and crawling, the design custom paintball jersey. Like any gun, you should invest in for your paintball skills? Practice, practice, practice! Plan out a training routine including several days per week of practicing specific skills and playing paintball. Take the first offering information and ideas about how big you plan on storing your paintballs in the design custom paintball jersey as blow back, hybrid blow back, hybrid blow back, electronic, pump, semi-auto, and full-auto are now available in kits or packages, which are ideal for beginners. A variety of colors. Paintball are also available in common sports shops. But to enthusiasts, collectors, or for those who have playing with different guns as possible and read as many paintball players need to feed it. Some players jam up to 20-40 paintball rounds, whereas a Semi-automatic gun can get pretty beat while you're learning to run, jump, and roll with it over and over again. Buy something cheap, reliable and sturdy that you won't get bored!
My question, then-How likely is it that it will be remembered if it is not discussed? Some of the recent political and social events have made me wonder if we are getting closer to a society in which such a thing might be able to be repeated. The rabid rantings of some ultraconservatives today sound a lot like the rantings of the Nazis. The divide and conquer, “us vs. them” mentality is very concerning to me as I read of the years leading up to World War II.
I’ve written all my blog posts from the view of someone who just LIKES sex. In every sense of the word LIKE.
Amazing, really.
“It is not known at this stage how the prisons intend to deliver the services currently performed by our staff and we are trying to maintain a professional working relationship with our key contacts in each of the three locations while a resolution is being sought,” Jan Hannant of the South Yorkshire probation trust told staff in an internal bulletin.
I love our ophthalmologist. Today my husband took Josh for his half yearly visit to his pediatric ophthalmologist. I needed a break from trying to keep Josh occupied during the unavoidably long waits in the waiting room (our doc is a very popular guy at a top teaching hospital). I don't usually mind the wait, though. Our ophthalmologist is a phenomenal guy.
Pop on up to today. Our home is not a new home. It's olden and was built in 1970.
Whilst all of this is happening, Saudi Arabia is pumping billions of dollars into the building of Mosques within which imams call for the overthrow of the democratic West, to be replaced by a global Islamic Caliphate. Their propaganda is eagerly absorbed. 40% of Muslims in Britain wish to see their adopted country run under Sharia law.
65) Hey, if I wistled at you, would you stop and talk to me? +
The extreme self-examination that is required will likely solicit accusations of self-centeredness from others, and in fact, will feel that way at times. However, it is the self-examined person who in the end will reach a greater capacity for empathy and compassion, and who as a result, will be better equipped to give of himself – in essence becoming less selfish.
Raw beef has surely never looked as beautiful as it did in a dish of Raw Beef, Radish, Beets, Eel. Thin slices of radish and tart green apple, and a blood-red beet puree offset the richness of the meat.
So all parents pussy-footed,
"Come on, forgive me," she inststed.
If the idea of writing an article or giving a speech feels overwhelming, stay with me. I’m going to show you how easy it can be if you follow a basic formula that works every time.
In the meantime, I'll leave you with some giant art goodness and also REMIND you to
Preheat the oven to 350 degrees.
Tonight as it gets cold
As I see it, statistical producers have three choices.
“There is no settling the point of precedency between a louse and a flea,” said Dr. Johnson. This is my position with respect to political parties stateside and in South Africa. How can a book that discounts the venerated vote and disavows all political parties have a political bias? Into the Cannibal’s Pot is manifestly against politics! A partiality for small government and big society - in other words, for civilization - is not a “political bias.” No, the prejudice was that of the petitioned publisher; his was a prejudice against an unorthodox perspective that comports with the classical liberal philosophy, and with reality.
All semblance of navigation was gone. There was no sun, moon or stars by which to determine position. The boat was not only adrift but was tossed like a cork on a troubled sea, which made footing well nigh unto impossible with a wet slippery deck as well. Then there was the constant danger of being blown or washed overboard. “All hope that we should be saved was taken away.”
Oh hell, if you don’t already see the humor in it, I’m never going to convince you.
But Hartlepool JPs threw out the case as they could not prove the mess belonged to Elliott.
Another interesting acquisition by a private sector company was the purchase, last year, of 20% shares in Manganese Bronze Holdings (MBH), manufacturers of London’s famous transport vehicle, the ‘black cab’, by a Shanghai-based, private automobile company, Geely International. Collaboration between the two companies had started with an order secured by Geely for 1,000 black cabs from Azerbaijan in 2011 – however, that deal later turned sour because of inordinate delays in receipt of payments and caused some loss to MBH. Geely, as the story published in The Economist in June 2011 titled ‘Streaks of red’ also pointed out, owns the Swedish car maker Volvo as well.
And the grave is not its goal;
Cafe Delice (upstairs)
According to EIA weekly report crude inventories grew by 2.8 million barrels to 375.9 million barrels vs. estimated increase of 2.5 million barrels for the week end 27 April.
Yea! It makes me think twice
It is truly an empowering tool.
(The 2 Neighbor kids are running around and playing tag with the 2 Farm Kids.)
It is worth remembering that no matter how much you love something at first spending a lot of time on it can eventually make it feel like a chore. Flamenco was a hobby I loved, dedicated time to and persevered with until I am now able to perform and teach. But I have to admit it can feel like a chore sometimes and though I never believed it when I first started taking classes there are days when I don't feel like going to rehearse or dance. I have heard even the most accomplished of professional dancers in the prime of their careers tell me that they just don't feel like dancing today.
(From Buzzfeed)
WW: "I don't know. It is out of stock."
I was lucky enough to catch up with Jeffrey Masson and his young family when they were in Sydney. We visited the recently renovated Museum of Contemporary of Art Australia – as have 4600 people a day. Walking through the museum I talked far too much about artists I know and love – including Tracey Moffatt, Gordon Bennett, Daniel Boyd, Ildako Kovacs, Jon Lewis and Tim Johnson. We watched some of Christian Marclay’s The Clock – 24 hours literally through references to the time in films. Jeffrey’s young sons couldn’t see the point of it – where was the story? It was more a labour of love/research exercise/editing triumph – although of course one is amused by some of the clips. Jack Nicholson singing?
Because both of them seem to share the same actual opinion:
My exposure to history as a child was mostly the 1950s version of the patriotic American story. The threat of Communism was very real to Catholic schoolchildren in those days. We knew about the imprisonment of Cardinal József Mindszenty, and prayed for him. The burgeoning parochial school system was dedicated to producing assimilated American Catholic children — very definitely, Red-White-and-Blue Catholics is what we were.
I don't know about you, but I am moving to a farm!!
More images on
This week I've brought you Eleanor Mae Hatter in a different color scheme. She dresses up beautifully in any color and is versatile for lots of occasions. She's available in foam mounted red rubber stamp.
What I find interesting is that people either want to embrace or distance themselves from attitudes that are “naturally” occurring in wild animals. What drives us to decide that we like certain behaviors but others are beneath us and uncivilized?
I'm pleased that this season brought this topic to my thought, and I look forward to exploring more traditions and celebrations, and to trying new ones both privately and as a family. I don't know if or which other celebrations or rituals we'll add in years to come. I'm sure that, as with the ones we have today, they'll be celebrations of the moments, small and large, that are most precious to us rather than simply because it's what we're supposed to do.
These Girl Fridays will be posting additional inspiration throughout the week that will be featured on our CAS-ual Fridays facebook page.
2. Beard
I’ve been quiet on my blog for a while because I’ve been busy writing other books. I’m really excited to finally be able to share this one! Last summer I met a remarkable woman named Lynn Devlin, who wanted to write a book about her story. She’s a speaker and workshop leader but needed a writer to help her get her story into the world. We worked closely together all last fall. Lynn is a palliative care and hospice nurse who regularly deals with end-of-life issues. When her husband of 24 years was diagnosed with Stage Four cancer, she was horrified. How could this have happened in her house?
This post’ll be fairly short (or concise, if you like), because there’s only so long you can go on about pixels.
i will hear sounds like i’ve never heard
8. I love to write letters. I love to receive letters as well.
Is it a calamity that Scheduled Castes and Scheduled Tribes are almost completely absent from newspapers and television? Of course it is. It’s a calamity for at least three reasons.
Cardstock: Rose Red, Pretty in Pink, Neenah White
we were all fired.
No, we didn't go to the cinema that evening. And that party was just truly amazing. Great food, lots of drinks and wonderful company of friends (and an iPad)... I count myself very lucky that I have such amazing friends. I will miss them very much...
We’ve got first class sisters, spy vs spy and American gang members hiding in Trinidad….Is this a Michael Bay or Jerry Bruckheimer movie script? Because all we missing is an explosion or car chase in the next 10 seconds.
Clackety-clack, a gentle sway from side to side, the fierce heat subsiding as we sped away from Bangkok bound for Surat Thani, the port from which we would catch the Lomprayah catamaran to Koh Samui. We pulled into the station in the early morning and were greeted by the rep from Lomprayah who took us across the road to a café to wait for the bus to the port.
Sun unloaded and moon’s delight.
I have a bunch of shit I could talk about, but I'm not really in the mood to write a full blog post about any particular topic, so I'll just blather on a few of the random events that happened this weekend...
Detroit is the story of America’s future.
Lightroom 3 Expands Image Showcasing
PSSS.....I just finished my very first week of work! HOORAY!
He says his guiding framework boils down to four questions: 1. “Why would someone spend their money with you — so what is unique about you?” 2. “Why would somebody work for you?” 3. “Why would society allow you to operate in their defined geography — their country?” 4. “And why would somebody invest their money with you?” Palmisano formulated those questions in the months after he became CEO in March 2002. The four questions, he explains, were a way to focus thinking and prod the company beyond its comfort zone and to make IBM pre-eminent again. He presented the four-question framework to the company’s top 300 managers at a meeting in early 2003. “This needs to be our mission and goal, to make IBM a great company,” he said.
When I’m not cheating, and taking pics with Instagram, I’m definitely taking these tips on board and hope my project photography is benefiting accordingly. Certainly using natural light, neutral backgrounds and turning off the flash is really helping get the colours true to life, which is particularly useful when it comes to delicious stash shots.
However, yesterday I may have redeemed myself in all aspects of motherhood with a little help from my friends. The past few weeks Luke has been experiencing nightmares. He wakes up screaming several times a night, usually four or five times hence sleep-deprived Lori, requiring me to comfort and sit with him until he goes back to sleep. When the sun came up yesterday morning I was finished. I knew I couldn't do this another night. I decided to make a few calls, and put into play what some would call a big, fat white lie.
TO DONATE TOUR OBSTACLES AND FUNDING TO BUILD A NEW SKATE PLAZA IN LOS ANGELES
Hugs, love and tons of smiles this weekend!!
Brouwerij De Molen Engels
It must be to everyone that Zimbabwe-style land grabbing is being implemented in the New South Africa. The ANC has no control over the ANC Youth League and there is an obvious battle for power between the ANC Regime and their Youth League.
And pose myself as an estuary.
DeMarco was charged with possession of a controlled substance and tampering with evidence. She was being held at the jail on $2,000 bond on Wednesday.
As for the U.S., the country which portrays itself as a ‘champion’ of free trade won’t permit foreigners to buy U.S. airlines or TV companies. Oil is also jealously guarded: China’s state-owned oil company, for instance, was prevented from purchasing struggling U.S. oil firm Unocal in 2005.
Secret of the Andes ~ by Ann Nolan Clark (Peru)
Sandy and her husband Tom have been married since 1980 and live near Grand Rapids, Michigan. They have three adult children and a growing number of grandchildren. When not writing and speaking, Sandy enjoys shopping at yard sales for vintage clothing, cooking, travelling, and drinking really good coffee (black is best) with her husband. For more information, contact Sandy at sandy@beautifulwomanhood.com. Subscribe to Sandy’s blog at www.beautifulwomanhood.com/blog. Find Sandy on Facebook at Beautiful Womanhood. Follow Sandy on Twitter @MentoringWives.
Leaving behind nights of terror and fear
I can remember seeing her at the table, enjoying the food as much as she enjoyed serving it. She never rushed through meals. She knew they were sacred. She liked to talk – to laugh – at the table. She communed, and perhaps that’s what stuck with me most.
He had charged that Africans should have understood the secret of development by sending mineral resources (some of which are iron ore, gold, diamond, feldspar, talc, bitumen, bauxite, silver, bronze, etc) to Europe, USA and Asia in exchange for technology which could have been relevant to the mass of people, rather than money which go into the pockets of only a few people (a phenomenon which has rudely created class schism, exploitation, corruption, and insubordination in places). The people are marginalized, dispossessed, cheated, humiliated, and dehumanized by only a few, a viable source of existing violence in places, anchored on the “struggles for power”. While people complain to no end, the leaders keep on stealing, cheating, and exploiting the people. Joshua even prophesied that such “powerful” people would always be targeted by the unemployed and poor youth and the under-paid workers, and where would they run to, eventually?
3. Management Consultant focusing on systems improvement, then on Customer Service and Leadership.
Jake got very excited and confirmed my comments with this: "Yes!! I honestly remember when I was little, being in the library and thinking about how I would love to work there. AND I clearly remember when we were listening to *The Book Thief*, and they were talking about repairing books, I thought, 'I would love to do that!'"
We would love to see all your summer layouts!!
One of my next big projects is our master closet. It’s atrocious. Incredibly atrocious. I’m determined to get it organized for good, and when I saw these units, I knew they would be perfect:
The Reserve Bank of India (RBI), India’s central bank, raised interest rates on Non-Resident Indian deposits in foreign currencies by up to 3 percent. This move enables Indian banks to offer higher interest rates on NRI deposits. Furthermore, the RBI deregulated interest rates on export financing to enable exporters to raise capital in foreign currencies without having to encounter any limit of interest ceilings. The RBI is also reported to have sold dollars in the markets to stem the depreciating rupee to the U.S Dollar which closed at INR 53.47 to a dollar. In other news RBI held 557.75 tonne of gold valued at USD 27.02b; accounting for 9.2 per cent of foreign exchange reserves. (Economic Times)
My word of the year suffered last month. I find that the harder I try to change certain things I know need to be changed, the harder it is to do so. I've been letting certain people, mainly family members, get under my skin. I've had less than loving thoughts and feelings towards them. None of which are justifiable. It's just been.......hard!
from rappin on the corner and now you goin platinum
Thank all of you so very much….I hope I have not been too confusing…..don’t worry if you don’t tell me about all of the things you did for extras, I will double check to make sure I pick up everyone’s extra entries on both blogs.
Here’s where you have to be firm, and continue the conversation. “No, really. If anything were ever to happen to me…” Gulp, deep breath. “If I ever get infected with the zombie virus, decapitate me. Shoot me in the head. Don’t hesitate. Save yourself and the children.”
I named this blog skinny and strong because while yes, I do want to be skinny, I don’t want to do it if it compromises my health. I’m on a journey to become skinny AND strong.
In South Africa the law is on the side of the criminal. When a black breaks into the house of a white person and even attempts to stab the owner, the owner is not allowed to simply defend himself with a firearm.'
Ryan's inscription says:
I think the important thing to remember is that, ultimately, everything is going to be okay. That is so hard for me to believe. But it is a mistake to think otherwise. I have a very tender heart.
That said, it doesn’t hide its 8% alcohol all that well. One of my key tenents here at the HBJ is I don’t particularly want my beer to taste like a “spirit”. My favorite ales can still be busting the 10% level, as many of them do, as long as I never doubt that it’s beer that I’m enjoying. Not the case here, though PERE JACQUES does have a lot of really interesting malts that give some strong flavor. It’s OK. I shan’t be drinking it again. 6/10.
- identify how many days Jesus stayed after the Resurrection
It was director Leo McCarey who teamed Laurel and Hardy in the 1927 vehicle Putting Pants on Philip. It took the team several films before they found their formula, largely assisted by McCarey. McCarey thought of the matching bowler hats, for example.
The following illustration depicts the major types of eye movements and their significance.
With the onset of Alzheimer’s, her lifetime cleaning habits suffered along with other aspects of her life, but her hands remained busy. Many times I saw her rooting around in her purse or a drawer, taking things out, examining them, and putting them back in. My theory was that she started looking for something but forgot what she was after, so she kept rooting around, hoping it would come back to her.
I don’t like hating on people with menial jobs as much as the next person. I’ve done those jobs myself – retail, bartending, door-to-door sales (I lasted an hour), admin, supermarket checkout chick – those are all soul-sucking jobs that few people would do for any reason other than money.
I am not a professional when it comes to the sales, although I have now come to realise that there are very genuine bargains to be had, especially in London in the summer. Fashion favourites that I coveted earlier in the year are now 50% off and will continue to slide as the month moves on. While the discounts are tempting it is finding the stamina to search that is the hard part....
The new camera stream puts viewers 80 feet off the ground and right beside the nest, where they can watch the hawks arrive, see them taking turns incubating the eggs, and compare notes on the two birds—the male has a more golden-tawny face and is slightly smaller than the female, who has been nicknamed “Big Red” for her alma mater.
Last July, I was in a posting slump and lamented my inability to post due to heavy pressure from adult responsibility. I considered myself a "voice from the void." Over the last month I've been on what I would consider, for me, a posting "binge." I wanted to test myself and got into the A to Z Challenge for the first time.
8. A FTTH connection AND a soapbox to let the world know of the complete, utter and total ineptitude of Virgin Media's installation team.
"Wah, wah, wah, wah...". (Mummy, she is looking at my...)
Pour over the chicken and leave for 1-2 hours.
After dinner, the pussycats go out to play in the big messy backyard, enclosed by cat proof fence. They roll around in the grass having little pretend-fights, and creep up on each other, and pounce, and lurk. And stalk magpies.
People baggage, on the other hand, is very easy to let go of in the West, as Satya rightly observes. If someone doesn’t accept your choices and keeps trying to meddle, for example, then that “toxic” person is best excised from your existence. Giving too much advice here can have personal penalties, another reason people are hesitant to speak out. (Intolerance = lack of virtue = person who should no longer be a friend.) Folks are encouraged to be independent to the point of selfish, considering their own wishes to be of greatest importance and quite above the interference of family, friends, or teachers. Independence holds a greater value than wisdom, and this can be personally and socially disastrous.
VERY DIFFICULT TO GET THE TRUTH PUBLISHED IN THE MAINSTREAM
For the body, I took a cardboard box an cut it down until it fit my brother better and cut arm holes in the side. Then I wrapped the whole thing in duct tape.
Stay neutral. Try not to ooze bias. Don’t appear to be persuaded by the subject’s opinions. Don’t judge or directly criticise the subject.
+ Not trusting your partner: The strength of a relationship is measured by how much you trust each other. Some people find it difficult to trust their partner, and for good reason too. If your partner has given you a reason, at one time or the other, not to trust him/her, then you are justified. If this is the case, then you should try to forgive your partner and give them a chance to gain your trust again. The love you have for your partner should enable you to trust them, or else, you will create a pattern of insecurity and jealousy which will eventually destroy that relationship.
In coffee two bits paid for,
Now to decide the Psyche and Willpower of the enlightened epee or basically how easily it is for the sword to take over a player. The Psyche is 1d12 and Willpower is just that added to Intelligence with a bonus of +1 for each spell like power the smart scimitar happens to have. Simple right? Anyway on to the fun part. Every time a few circumstances happen the sword will attempt to take control of its wielder and this is called an influence check. They happen the first time a wielder touches it, when the swords motivation comes into play, someone of differing alignment touches it, another shrewd saber is found, and finally the wielder has lost 50% of their HP. The check itself is just comparing the its Willpower with the wielders which is determined by adding their Strength to their Wisdom and subtracting 1d4 if they are wounded but greater then 50% HP or 2d4 if equal to or lower then 50% HP. The sword also gets a bonus 1d10 if the person wielding it is of a different alignment. If the wielder loses then the foxy foil gets control of the character for an amount of time determined by the DM and will cause them to do something related to its goals such as ignoring the new shiny or go into combat. The control will generally only last a couple rounds but that should be enough to get what is needed done like causing the party to fight a group of orcs instead of just hiding from them.
The client will then begin to tell your team member why they are interested in a large SUV. Rather than your team member just taking them to the vehicle, they need to start building rapport and listening to what the client has to say.
The meeting should finish by 6.30pm, inclusive of light refreshments: the talk will last around 20 minutes, following which there will be a chance for some light networking, Everyone is welcome. If you'd like to attend, email me here.
Those who know him in The EU portray him as wandering around in his slippers or gently dozing at his office desk overcome by his own age and bewilderment!
1/2 small onion, diced
Poking at the pastured ground beef to see if it has defrosted enough to make sliders with.
Start to worry when:
In short, there’s a lot happening. There will be a Facebook page. And we’ll be on Twitter...
I am seriously a sucker for a cool lapel. The material is actually a very thick cotton, almost denim, but it's fully lined, even down the sleeves. Pretty unusual. I love the fit and the fact that the bottom of it has belt loops (that's my old trust black belt in there). It's French Connection, and I see by their website that their jackets are around $178. I guess 10% of that is not so bad after all!
Please add your direct link to the inlinkz below
If you can recall few years back when Dato’ Shahrir from BN Johor Bahru supported a motion by the opposition, he has been condemned by many BN MPs for not complying to party’s policy eventhough in his personal believe, the motion is good and should be supported. Also, if you remember how Hassan Ali has been sacked for many times supporting government’s initiative especially the co-operation between UMNO and PAS on Islamic matters, which of his personal believe is good.
Off to work.
I'd really like to know about 100 more details... to help me feel like it's over... ya know?
7. Think About Your Troubles
I’ve accomplished three things on the list and about ten that aren’t. That is how I roll. :)
Why, then, are political leaders in France and Germany trying so hard to prevent – or, more accurately, to postpone – the inevitable? There are two reasons.
Children with an increased risk of lead poisoning include those who:
Label: Oasis
You might be only four but you can remember the important things Mummy and Daddy spent 18 years teaching you. You know how to hold out your hand and say 'NO!' in a loud voice if someone tries to touch you, to say the police will come to look after you, to call out for your Mummy so she knows to come to you. Mummy and Daddy were so proud of you for being their big girl and learning these skills, you try to remember that as you lie on the floor of your shower, surrounded by grown ups shouting at you, throwing cold water all over you, sitting on you and choking you. You cry and cry for your Mum but it just makes the carers hit you more. Sometimes the nurses come along and you look at them while you're on the floor, pinned beneath a chair, but then someone puts a blanket over your head so you can't look at them anymore. The blanket's brown and scratchy and you cry for your pink balloons while they hit you some more.
I met up with Catherine first because she had been so constructive with suggestions as to how I might make certain parts of the story work better. We hit it off, and I left RCW knowing that she was the person that I wanted to work with. I decided not to meet the other agencies and signed with RCW a few days later.
Mushroom Gravy :
Puppies are great people. Puppies effing ROCK. We have an amazing health care system, loads of functional social services, our streets are clean, our education isn't half bad, and "La Crise", didn't hit us as hard as a lot of other countries.
2 tsp pumpkin pie spice (I am faithful to McCormick brand)
Still under the leadership of their captain, it was decided that a last push would be made to gather and unite the crewmembers and attempt to get off-world before their diminishing resources forever marooned them on a hostile world. Mustering their strength, they marched back to the north and to war with the vanir who, by this time, had no interest in returning to the stars. Even with the aid of their psychic powers and their alfar allies, the vanir were no match for the well-armed and organized crew members, and the vanir were forced to capitulate.
and while I 100% believe in being realistic, I would also like to be blissful.
These past few months I have had my ups and downs, I've had doubts, thoughts of regret and mistakes made. I felt like nothing was going in my favour, but something has happened...What's happened you ask? I don't know lol, I mean I must have actioned some sort of positive action and caused a reaction to cause everything in my life deemed bad/wrong is reversed. Yes good things are starting to happen to me.
Gary talked enthusiastically about the observatory and astronomy, impressing us with some stunning photographs of the night sky that literally made everyone gasp as we sat, cross-legged, with a straightforward glass of Bowmore Darkest. Despite the fact that the naked eye can’t see as much as the Hubble Space Telescope, by the end of Gary’s talk, I have no doubt that a majority of his audience was longing for a night of stargazing with good friends and a bottle of whisky, even if they’d never considered it before!
Then good old Monday came along and guess what happened? I got lazy. When getting up at 5:30 every morning and having a jam-packed day comes into the picture, priorities change. Because I had such little time between my morning conditioning session and classes, my bathing routine quickly switched back to using the shower, and my dishes only got clean under running hot water in order to save time. And if I can be quite frank, it still hasn’t switched back!
I may = c = 261.63, g = 392
HNY!!
Stay in touch!!!!
Wall Street
We were to use limeade, river rock and garden green. She also wanted us to make a St Patrick's Day card or use a blessing. I did both for my card.
“Who me?” I coyly replied. ”I always dress like this.”
Technically brilliant and emotionally wrenching, District 9 has action, imagination, and all the elements of a thoroughly entertaining science-fiction classic. This film is truly brilliant and it was very surprising when I first saw it. This film seems to me a movie somewhere between transformers and alien nation and works very well.
Peter discovers that Gregory believes cell phones to be radiation hazards, and considers the towers a blight on the landscape. Gregory intends to drive Vista Tel out of business by destroying their towers, but the cell phone company is ignoring his actions.
Now that I’ve had time to process the news of our big move and HUGE life change, I’ll definitely be much better about remembering to take pics of all the fun stuff we’re doing to end the year in 1st grade :) The tricky part will be keeping this house clean with two crazy boys and all of their little toys and messy little hands…should be FUN! HA!!
To be fair to him, I was wearing a very large coat (my boyfriend’s) that I’d never worn before, as well as a baseball cap (also my boyfriend’s), and I hadn’t called my usual morning greeting to announce myself.
SUZFC Blog (suzfcblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Please send your image(s) no later than the 13th of April.
Valentine's Day- 18 weeks
“Tivoli: A Place We Call Home” is produced by photographer/filmmaker, Delphine Fawundu Buford, along with filmmakers Scott Brathwaite and Anthony Clouden Jr. These three long-time friends and residents at Tivoli Towers felt the need to collect visual histories of their own community.
Well I think about it for a bit and then I think, there was a time (more than one) when I was lonely. I wanted to make friends with someone and THEY decided there wasn’t anything in it for them, so they rejected me. It didn’t feel great. NOW I’m the one who can withhold or reject. So I wrote my acquaintance a friendly email, saying that it was nice that she’d got in touch and that I know how it feels to be lonely. I hope she’ll write back.
And the other part of it is that it truly is an international festival. I'm currently working on a book about cider with ace photographer Bill Bradshaw, and we're discovering small cider making communities all around the world who are only just starting to realise they're not alone. This is one of the first events in the world that will offer some kind of international perspective, from the Apfelwein culture around Frankfurt to the flamboyant sidra performance pouring of Asturias in northern Spain.
American Crafts Rubon Greeting.
Aspen: Yes!
News arrives of a pelican who has fallen in love with a woman. Well they’re not the smartest creatures, are they? Apparently, this one likes to suck the woman’s hair and play with her shoelaces. “Right idea, wrong areas of the body” would be the kindest comment on those attempts at foreplay. You have to feel sorry for the pelican, really, because the love disease is devastating enough for the most level-headed beings, let alone a bird-brained squawker with a bag under its beak.
Proudly Mountain Tribe ... by way of New Jersey. Okay, that peg is really gonna fit that hole.
Contains: some foul language
It’s fascinating to come into contact with young readers, and to see their imaginations at work. In the workshops that I do, I try to give them the freedom to roam, to play around with their own ideas, without the preoccupation with planning, spelling and punctuation which is often inevitable in school hours.
As many of you know I am a fan of Keta's books and this book I have to say is my favorite so far. It basically has two stories in one book.- Creed/Lauren and Sage/Wanapaya - Two sisters that neither know that other exists until fate brings them together.
The kid asked the guy did they carry an inverted hex clean out cover which was 3 1/2 inches. The look of surprise was on the kids face but Mr long hair looked at me and said "sorry we have nothing like that" Ahhh aren't I in home depot where you have everything, (not that part). So off I head to the True Value Hardware store in town, walking into this family owned business is like walking into the 50's, everything is laid out just like the old days and no less a wooded floor.
You may submit as many entries as you like.
There are also some costs to such a decision by a person of privilege. There are people in one’s community who will resist any questioning of the status quo and may view one as a traitor to one’s racial or ethnic group. This experience is difficult and painful and often the major deterrent to people of privilege challenging injustice.
Some of their nice boots available as follows:-
As is my wont...
Over The Hills And Far Away
She's got legions of fans, her books seem to become bestsellers before they are even out of the gate, and she writes about what's really important. I loved Some Assembly Required (written with her incredible son Sam) because she talks about how difficult it is to let go of our children and let them have independence, how thorny, wild and wonderful it can be to navigate from being a mother to being a grandmother, and how love and hope and faith are the glue that holds it all together.
I swear to God this actually happened.
*All runners who have finished their registered events in all 3 legs will receive a special Grand Prix shirt and a medal.
Readers, excuse the advert, but the blog is free so commercially-related messages are sometimes inevitable. This may also be of interest I hope.
Take note that the Boers today have good reason to be immensely frustrated and angered. We have not only lost all forms of the partial self-determination we previously enjoyed, through the treacherous dealings of Afrikaner politicians, but have lost virtually all rights to make a decent living and bringing up our children with good values and good learning. All indications are that the marginalizing of the Boer will only get worse under the present regime, which is regarded by us as illegitimate.
Every step this woman took was to exert control over her children, to get them to comply with her idea of what her family should look like and be like. All of it failed over and over again. She stopped seeing her children as they were and could only see them for what they were not. They were not compliant children who aspired to go to school and get good grades, they were bad children who misbehaved and didn't follow the rules.
During the 2010-2011 corps year, The Chicago White Sox for the first time became a team sponsor for the City Year Team serving at Paul Robeson High School. This event has always been a great opportunity for City Year and the Chicago White Sox to work together to make the community of Chicago a more beautiful place.
I placed gemstones across the punched areas of the plaid paper. I added some punched paper flowers in the corners of the plaid paper. These were attached to the paper with 3-D Crystal Lacquer. (Please see photos for placement suggestions.) I used glitter glue in the middles of the flowers.
I wish somewhere someday it doesn’t remain sometime anymore
Nor did the magnesium flash a moment later.
Breakfast: French Toast & sausage
4) Use funnel to add equal parts rice and dried lavender. (Or mix a few drops of essential oils with rice and let it dry a bit before putting the rice into the eye mask. You will obviously be using more rice with this method.)
though one in seven claims to have
A scratchy voice spoke unintelligibly from the police radio in the car.
The LLRC even with its apologist contradictory wording and repetitive lip-service calls for changes that need speedy implementation. In the very words of the polemic resolution there exists,
Lucy originally got her start on American Juniors and later began acting. She said she definitely thinks singing will be in her future! Lucy looks gorgeous in all of these photos!
DTE last year replaced key boiler parts at the plant about 40 miles south of Detroit. The EPA claims the project qualified as a “major modification,” which should have forced the utility to install state-of-the-art pollution controls.
With these considerations in mind, I think the case for nonintervention remains overwhelmingly persuasive from moral, legal, and political perspectives. Perhaps, the most compelling rationale for reaching such a conclusion was well stated by Roger Cohen: “But the deepest reason is the moral bankruptcy of the West with respect to the Arab world. Arabs have no need of U.S. or European soldiers as they seek the freedom that America and the European Union were content to deny them.” (NY Times, March 7, 2011) It is not often that I have the opportunity to quote approvingly from the New York Times when the subject-matter involves the Middle East, and so I want to make the most of it.
Dipping chocolate - I am going to use almond bark
I’m lucky, too, to live in a building where the neighbors like each other and like to talk to each other. One unexpected pleasure happened this past Tuesday evening. It was a gorgeous night with temperatures we hadn’t seen in a while. As I pulled down the lane, Jim and Julie were setting up camp on the front lawn. Jim waved me over showing his display of varied and tasty wines. By the time I heated up homemade chili and sourdough bread and brought it back down, half the building was on the lawn enjoying the night.
An illustration of the Rhinemaidens
The girls protested a bit, but eventually he got them into the car. Angel could buckle her own seat belt but sometimes she would have trouble and he’d make it onto the street before he realized she hadn’t been buckled in yet. This time she had no problem doing it herself, which made him smile. She’s getting bigger every day, he thought.
Display resolution:
Rainbow pinata & lollipops -- Birthday Express
So everybody is like that. We are bipolar, too. The cover was dumb, the questions were leading, I think Fussman needs therapy and he was trying to get it from Vergara, and her answers were shallow and disappointing.
Oh, the joys of being a full-time MA classics and ancient history student when I also have a part-time job. However, that’s my choice, so no feeling sorry for myself here. There’s work to be done.
Those whom own it listen to their souls.
Outings to the pub
I will also talk about how I am using my other tools such as:
Mom: I'd give him a four out of ten and a cough drop.
But this book is a bit of a departure for Merlis. “This is more of an art book,” he explained this week while discussing the book at Park Slope’s Old Stone House.
During that time, a serviceman flying a “Huey Slick” helicopter carrying troops recalls that his ship received combat damage to the extent that he had to return to base at Soc Trang:
I've long suspected there's a little smug joy in that 'Junior, there's no Santa Claus' speech. Just a touch. A perverse pleasure in bursting that bubble, of bringing the blissfully innocent into the clubhouse of the knowing. The knowing and miserable. But maybe that's Dad's joy more than Mom's.
Cobbs
"Oh, that's ridiculous, she said. "Totally not true. Can't prove it. And who cares if they notice us.”
happy sparkles and glittering :)
While Josie Moore has not exactly made peace with her decision to give up her baby boy, she has learned to accept it. Finished with college, but without a boyfriend or job, she was convinced it was her only choice. What she can’t accept is Mike and Georgia Cameron’s divorce. After choosing them so carefully, she is stunned to discover they divorced shortly after the adoption. She is also angry that they ignored their agreement to send updates and pictures, but she is legally unable to do anything about it.
On Pinocchio: Okay, I don’t think you can really blame a small child for taking advantage of an escape option if it’s presented instead of trying to take care of a baby, particularly since he was obviously in a situation where he couldn’t do much. HOWEVER:
* Alone in the Kitchen with an Eggplant by Jenni Ferrari-Adler. This is not your typical cookbook. It's more of a collection of short stories written by foodies who share their favourite recipes for when they eat alone. (I made them all and they are really good).
A.D. 707. MAELDOBORCON, Bishop of Kildare, died on the 19th of February."(Four Masters.) "A.D. 708. Maeldoborcon, Episcopus Cille-daro, pausavit." (Annal Ult.) The death of this Prelate is stated by some to have taken place in the year 704 (Ware). Keating (Book, 2, p. 46,) relates that King Congall Kennmagar persecuted the Church at this time, and burned the secular and regular clergy of Kildare; but Lanigan discredits this statement, judging to the contrary from the peaceable and prosperous reign ascribed to this monarch by old writers. A great conflagration, it is true, laid Kildare waste in 709 (Four Masters), during this King's reign; and, as we may suppose that some clerics lost their lives in this fire, this circumstance may have given occasion to the story.
paws, finding no ground, whip at air,
Hill (Mason, MI) is a midfielder who had seven goals and four assists and was second on the Spring Arbor team with 26 shots.
When longtime CONTROL nemesis KAOS attacks the agency's headquarters and exposes the identities of its key operatives, the Chief has no choice but to upgrade Max's status to Agent 86 and dispatch him on the kind of dangerous mission that would challenge even a veteran.
Godspeed, Gay Hands. May you clutch a peen or two in life if ever you are ok with the reality of it.
much more space
Beginning May 10th, this little girl will be perched on bookshelves in stores throughout the UK. And as if she's not sweet enough, here's a really sweet deal to add to the pot: For a limited time the publisher is offering the e-book here for a special promotional rate of a mere £1.99. Yep. Sweet.
higher than soul can hope or mind can hide)
Product information: You might have lots of lovely pictures of your product in your photo albums, but have you listed the item description, size, colours availability, price, postage, stock availability, how to contact you to order and lead time underneath? If customers have to leave a comment under your picture to ask, you have probably lost the sale. Remember that Facebook does not notify you when someone comments on a photo. So by the time you find the comment and respond, it could be too late. And this does go for people who have online stores too; sometimes people just don’t bother to go to your online store.
So. Flashback Friday.
What would I pay? $12.00 in a cigar store. But you are in luck. They sell for about $4.50 through Cigar International, which is the only place I have run across them so far.
1 analogue
But I’m more of a story-teller than a writer.
Other villains have come and gone, but the Joker should remain imprinted on people because he is evil with all the glamor and ambiguity stripped away. He lies about everything, he relishes in goading good people to break rules, he destroys things and people for fun and he does it all for evil’s sake.
The song begins to play,
“I would treat this with quite a degree of scepticism,” said Nic Borain, an independent political analyst based in Cape Town.
i know these next couple of months will be hard, not only for myself, but also for a few of my dear BLM friends as we head for holidays and angelversaries. today, my heart is with my dear friend tiffany and her family as they mark the 1st angelversary of their amazing girl Ellie. i got the opportunity to meet tiffany and her family back in july when i went on my getaway to MN. and just like all of the BLMs that i have come to know since losing Julius, i feel a deep connection to her and her baby girl. so my heart is extra heavy today. if you get a chance, please stop by her blog and read all about her precious Ellie and say a little prayer for them.
(3) Hubs.
All of Farman Shinwari’s brothers are affiliated with the Tehrik-i-Taliban Pakistan (TTP) and other militant groups. His elder brother Hazrat Nabi Shinwari, alias Tamanchy Mulla, was a theology teacher in a government-run school in Landikotal. He was leading the TTP in Khyber Agency in 2005 and also used to send militants to Kashmir and Afghanistan. He has remained the head of Harkatul Mujahideen and is nowadays said to be leading his group of TTP men in Waziristan.
These hedgerows are my home, and in time they'll be my food and my medicine too. A little while ago, I was interviewed for the wonderful Plant Healer Magazine. It was a long and in depth interview with lots of photos and a focus on wilderness. Do order a subscription, it's lavishly presented and packed with herbal wisdoms and wonders.
Back in the barn, David Troughton... I mean, Private Moor is alone, guarding Von Weich. Moor gives Von Weich back his monocle which he uses to hypnotise Moor into freeing him. Just as he does Zoe, Russell and the other resistance members arrive. Russell fights the reconditioned Moor, and bests him but Von Weich wrestles Russell's gun from him. However Moor comes to Russell's rescue and shoots Von Weich dead.
The house is one story. Wooden clapboard. Most of the white paint has been chipped away. One of the front windows is broken. The roof is covered with black shingles
The premise of this drug is not without it's drawbacks. We understand that it will not cure someone suffering from a debilitating illness. However, Daisy has died more than once by asphyxiation. That made me question how that drug will work because if her brain was deprived of oxygen shouldn't there have been some damage? Especially if it was more than once? However, it wasn't hard to suspend belief and we just assume that they got to her in scant seconds, always at the ready. Even though I had this question, I admit it didn't bother me that much. It's fiction and I can suspend my belief for the sake of the story.
I had not anticipated attention. But as soon as I walked in, eyes fell onto me and stayed there. One chubby boy ran up to me and pointed to my face, exclaiming:
Fair enough: It was her big day, and she wanted the damn music.
For the memory-of-potential patience.
I could go out looking for work, but I don’t want to seem needy.
Love will do these things, if we let it. We just need to let it take over and drive.
At Thanksgiving, have you ever felt a loss that made you question why you should be grateful, made you angry with God?
Yesterday he come up to me and suddenly said biting hurts. I can’t even image the amount of pain he must be going through on a day to day basis. His wrists might be wounded but his soul is still bright and unhurt. I hope it always stays that way.
I was tired of the old blog look, so I updated it to something completely different. I like it. It's the start of a new season, there are new beginnings in my life, and I'm back to simplifying quite a bit. It is definitely time for a change! I also have some exciting news to come in the next week.
sympathize or care about Exner and the voice-over narration is distracting.
Here’s how it works technically: being tired, bored or unmotivated releases very small amounts of catecholamines (hormones produced by the adrenal glands) such as dopamine and norepinephrine, while being stressed creates a massive and constant flow. The ideal state is that of being alert and interested, in which case short bursts of catecholamines are released in response to stimulus in the environment.
806 ***D-III/13/1981. “Science, Repression and Morality: The Evolution Controversy Today.” Clarence Darrow Memorial Meeting, Jackson Park and the Museum of Science and Industry, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-3, above, pp. 482-85 (1983).)
Interestingly, the Directors of the Company are Masing’s known business partner and close confidant, Kristoffer Nyuak Bajok, and other people clearly linked to Masing.
Would people actually vote for president if they didn’t have to go to a poll and instead could text their vote, or vote on Facebook? Would this become a real democracy then? And would we like the things that this style of voting revealed?
Just the fact that she’s in a relationship requires everyone to adapt and rules have to be put in place.
I told you yesterday that March was going to be a BUSY month for me on the blog. Well here's just one of the few exciting things I have going on! Awhile back, one of my favorite stamp artist put a call out for some help with her latest release - and I made the cut!
I have to believe that Michael's "China mom" loved him... how could you carry a child for 9 months and not love them?
Of course, Frantz, Patrick, Quinn and even national chairman Williams - a regular on cable TV news shows - are somewhat overshadowed by the movement's biggest name... former Alaska governor, 2008 Republican vice presidential candidate and current Fox News contributor Sarah Palin.
(This was an early final, so they'd have two chances. They had the option to just leave and take the official final on Monday. Everyone wanted their two chances, and worked hard on the hillside.)
Now, the biggest problem for me is this, and this was revealed by the main customer service representative at HQ: SKYY PLUS antennas are not as STRONG as those of SMART TV. My query, then, is if that is so, why on Earth did they decide to merge? Why merge with an inferior competitor? The situation now is that we have channels we are receiving from SKYY PLUS(Skyy world/Skyy one, etc) alongside channels from SMART TV, which is the baby of NEXT GENERATION BROADCASTING.
If you want a good overview of all things spiritual and like an easy read, then this is your book. It could also be of a great help if you have been bereaved., this is a very sensitive book.
“It’s very clear that they don’t want people there,” she said of the area where the clan has been loitering, noting that it had ransacked a jungle ranger’s post that authorities later removed.
I hope that you like it as much as me!
Suddenly those dreamed-of profits are in reach of all four of your little green arms.
But releasing that statement to the press before notifying the parents, and releasing it mere hours before Henry’s memorial service – on a weekend, late on a Friday night, no less – instead of waiting until Monday? Or at least Saturday afternoon or evening after the young man was laid to rest?
Delhi’s mood varies from locality to locality. The by-lanes of Old Delhi are like a surreal art house movie taking you to a different time zone and then there are sprawling parks, university campuses , the ridge areas thick with wood and grass and all their unsolved mysteries.
Today I do not have to work hard to get to the idea of food. I did not have recipes selected so I turned to my old Taste of Home Annual Cookbook of QUICK COOKING. I think my guardian angel opened the book because there on that page were two simple to make complementary suggestions. Try them together and impress your family.
Also rolling them very thin makes them perfectly enjoyable. Thick strips will become soggy.
When asked if she has a special someone in her life, PZ said, “These days I get scared telling people that I am single because when I say that, I get linked to everybody I meet. So I have a new strategy today – when people ask me if I am single I say ‘I am dating somebody and it`s a big secret’ as that’s safer than saying I’m single.”
What I do, every day I write, is all because of Michael Jackson. If MJ hadn't been there to fire my interest, to show me a path that could be taken, I'd still be a librarian. I might be happy with that, but I wouldn't have had the fun, the late nights with great people, the satisfaction of a well-written piece or the satisfaction of opening someone's eyes to a great beer, if not for Michael Jackson.
there is time for
It is ‘said’ that because they are not having a varied diet, their bodies are not getting enough of the right nutrients and vitamins. This, again, is untrue.
“Gruff and young Mister Meadowsweet will arrive tomorrow morning to unload the carriage and take the team down to greener pastures,” the merchant announced.
Be sure to make him/her do the dishes.
4. I want to continue on with my preparing food for the week on Sunday’s goal, but to make it different the goal here is to find two new recipes this month and make them! Must add variety to what I’ve been doing!
It's been a while since I've posted. Sorry about that.
My story of coming to terms with my aging went like this:
And if you ever tried it,
Arguably, various characters and scenes have been stereotyped and over-exaggerated but I don’t see this as a negative; it simply forces the audience to become involved and question their own thoughts as well as those of the individual characters. In addition, several moments of blatant comedy are present to intercut the drama and allow the play to breathe.
Pitkin County, Colorado
It took us around 2-3 hours if I’m not mistaken taking photos, and checking the entire place. Then the driver told us that we need to go to the other place because it will take another couple of hours for drive time.
2 eggs, lightly beaten
cuz Six won't give
Payment protection insurance was typically sold alongside mortgages, credit cards and personal loans to protect repayments if a borrower fell ill or lost their job. Since 2005 about 16m customers bought policies worth £17bn, according to the regulator. Many were mis-sold policies by providers who tacked them on to loans without customers knowing about or needing them.
I sometimes feel that I just want people to STOP wanting things from me and just SCREAM OUT LOUD -
the translations, the background check (to double-check info etc), the timing to insert each and every phrase….
The beauty of this approach is that it minimizes, if not eliminates, the effect of any individual coach’s bias or conflict. Go back and look at Tony Barnhart’s analysis of the final regular season coaches’ poll of 2007. Remember stuff like this?
Ananda Shankar - Ananda Shankar
hey, i was 18 when we met - young love!
Humbert’s constant use of French is also very irritating (which Lolita thankfully voiced at one point in the novel). Random sentences and sometimes even paragraphs are written in French, which (being Australian) I certainly can’t understand but didn’t feel like dragging myself to the internet to translate. Though I see the literary and character point (Humbert is pretentious enough to constantly use a foreign ‘fancier’ language in an English speaking country and to his English reading audience), this still grated on me.
But when the bath was filled we found a fur,
As I moved forward, I could see that it was day, but there was no sunshine, just pouring rain. All around was dark, dreary, and gray. A group of people, larger than ours, stood off to one side, huddled under a corrugated metal overhang, silently watching. We stumbled towards them, as the foreign-looking gunmen, speaking in a strange language I did not know, pointed their guns in this direction. But their guns seemed out of place, for no one fought anymore. Resistance had already been removed from us.
I haven't had internet for awhile but I wanted to mention that the February issue of NYLON Magazine is out and my ad for Collection B is on page 119.
Meanwhile, I'm left wondering: In the contest between Israel's security demands and its political leadership, who does Ben Kerstein think I need to agree with in order to avoid being anti-Semitic? Inquiring minds want to know.
Line Personnel:
Whatthe hell are they doing?
as for tagging… well, Joleene lamented a lack of Blog Awards, then it seems right to reciprocate Ben and Georgina who awarded me this year… then again you who are staring at the badge and so badly want it on your blog, grab it. Answer my questions and let me know.
In recent years, the nation of Brazil has established itself as a global environmental leader in conserving forests, managing natural resources and taking steps to solve climate change.
So I let my dough sit in the fridge for two days, when we were having the no boil penne leftovers. My intentions were to let the leftover dough sit out for an hour before making it. Nope. I totally spaced out. At 5:00 I yelped, "Oh no! I forgot to take the bread out." (This was particularly confusing to my friend who I was on the phone with at the time and it didn't quite make since with the flow of our conversation.)
Oh well tomorrow I will sleep in. Today though, when I stepped on the scale it finally moved down a 1 lb. Yeah, lets keep that momentum. Yesterday I went for a new walk, down a different path. I know, I am a wild woman. Woot Woot. It was kinda cool, I walked and saw new sites. I agree, my life is very boring. I text paged my friend (the RN) who's office is next door to mine. I told her to look out her back window. I was across the canyon and I waved to her. She texted back to flash her. LOL, crazy lady.
Here's some sneaky peeks...
You’ve been in a number of different films and TV projects – which actors/actresses have been your favourites to work with so far?
Donald and Peta danced a paso doble to "Purple Haze." Donald said other athletes had done well with the paso (he's watched every season) and hoped he would, too. The judges loved it. Bruno because he was shirtless, and Carrie Ann because it was hot. She said it would go down as the most memorable dance of the season. They got a 27, highest score of the night. I thought he might get at least one 10.
I prefer the curl up variation over the more popular russian twists pictured below. In my opinion putting someone into flexion and then rotation is asking for disc issue down the road especially since most people can’t avoid excessive lumbar flexion at the top of this position.
And the cat read in origami style and found the letters encrypted below
On this date in 1886 a pioneer in American music was born in Columbus, GA. Gertrude Pridgett was a precocious singer, joining a local revue at the age of 14 and joining the touring Rabbit Foot Minstrels within a couple of years. She met William “Pa” Rainey in 1904 and they were soon married. They travelled and performed together and she was billed Madame Gertrude Rainey, eventually shortening it to Ma Rainey to match her song and dance partner’s stage name. They soon began their own travelling show, Rainey and Rainey — Assassinators of the Blues.
Mike: Dennis Rodman is the cross-dressing basketball player.
But not long after Rapido, the 36th scored a great victory with the capture of the town of Velletri, the last major stop before Rome. Major General Fred Walker, Commander of the 36th, had ordered his engineers to build a road up the 3,100-foot Mount Artemisio behind the town. The Germans in the town found themselves surrounded, and those that weren’t captured or killed fled, rather than digging in and fighting to the death like trapped rats.
For this recipe though, the Weirdness In Our Minds part comes from something cuh-lassy that Bubba and I call, affectionately - even reverently - The Big Bowl of Failure.
each and every cell in my body
During operation depletion, the pre-move cleansing of my cellar, I dipped into a few bottles I'd been hanging onto, some of which, like these two, were brought back from Virginia for me by my colleague, and whisky pimp, Ruediger.
not the quaver softness of child-stretched flesh
And… new blogger on the block…Magic Circle Minx… using the wonderful movie tool which I enjoyed using some time back… Tis The Season To Train As A Lawyer
India is a passionate and emotion packed country. We put our heroes on cloud 9 the moment they achieve something of world recognition and bring them down mercilessly at one wrong move.
So you’ve found your Goldilocks plot – not too big and definitely not too small. Now it’s time to start living the dream and turning vague ideas of your ideal house into a reality. Whichever route you take, it’s worth noting down what you want from your new home, such as the approximate size, rooms needed, and how you want to use those spaces. Think about how you live now and how you’d like to improve on your current home.
2 cups coarse salt (must be coarse)
So, what do we do?
European health officials have debated whether the canthaxanthin added to the feed to give farmed salmon their pink hue poses any human health risk. Canthaxanthin was linked to retinal damage in people when taken as a sunless tanning pill, leading the British to ban its use as a tanning agent. (In the U.S., it’s still available.)
communities to have served in their ecclesiastical ministry from 1950-2002.
He had come in with a penis problem, and she told him that in 20 years as a professional nurse she had never laughed at a patient.
Is this where we are at? Rather than human contact we are going to ignore each other for the "relationship" through the electronic device in our hands.
I want to show off some of my busy-ness.
Spare a thought for me, the poet
i go to school,
Count of Katzenellenbogen, Ziegenhain and Nidda, My gracious lord.
I’m sitting here on my sofa
I know I have to let go. I have to raise the bar for my little dude, nudge him. But his anxieties and meltdowns are so painful to watch. I feel them along with him. He generally doesn’t even want to talk about Kindergarten! I anticipate a shaky start, some bumps in the road but I have to believe we will get through it and he will succeed; surpassing my expectations as he is known to do.
11:00 till the Wee Hours
To erase the bitter sweet memories of him
So i am going to aim for more love in whatever i do.
I had to share...
He’s a teacher of life. He always corrects me, no matter what I’m doing, or who I’m with. It’s a bit annoying at times, but a blessing always. One of the major lessons I have been taught is to look at the big picture. Tough to see the big picture when you’re young like me, but as you grow, that big picture is not too blurry.
We got the tree home, found a spot in the yard, and got to planting it right away. But oh no! We're in the middle of a drought. As the weeks and months went by I grew more and more worried about my tree. The leaves weren't looking very healthy and I was afraid maybe it was diseased. Yes, we watered it every few days but apparently we weren't watering enough, or maybe barely enough, for it to take.
“So when you put all that together, the cooking with beer, the pairing food with beer, the whole wide-ranging genre of beer styles and beer flavors — it’s something that women can get really excited about.”
Denying
I hope everyone will embrace the change (i know switching URLs is such a pain - sorry!), and I appreciate those who stop by to read Dress, Design & Decor daily (which will remain online so you can look back whenever you want). I will try to make the switch for Google Reader subscribers easy with no effort on your part, and the same for those subscribed by email. I kindly ask those who have my blog linked on their sites to update the name and URL when you get a chance. It's much appreciated! I will be switching everything over within the next few days, so please excuse any technical mishaps.
visiting the Earth and leaving clues, abducting people for experiments and torture.
And while you're at it, take a minute to visit the other bloggers who are sharing their inspirations with the blog community today!
A large pair of silk bloomers that belonged to Queen Victoria have sold for more than three times their original estimate. The undergarment, auctioned alongside hundreds of other royal artefacts, sold for £9,735.
(734): Medical school killed my enjoyment of porn. Hard to keep a boner when you’re diagnosing all the actor’s STDs and skin disorders.
The right to own property is an essential element of liberal and conservative value systems alike, and appropriately so. Such rights are the defining difference between serfdom and freedom, between extractive feudal economies and modern democracy. But certain beliefs of conservatives with regard to property are problematic.
“We could share clothes”.
Girl sleeps in my bed.
The smell of turkey baking, the Thanksgiving parade on the TV (whether anyone’s watching it or not) followed by the Lion’s game (we may actually watch it this year), and the sound of Christmas music (Thanksgiving is the first official day of listening to Christmas music here, although every year someone tries to cheat and listen to it earlier). These are the traditions that have woven the background of Thanksgiving celebrations since my childhood, but every year has a unique flavor all it’s own.
So, in the time between the last time I wrote on this blog and now, I officially became a birth doula, I'm nearly finished with my Christian Childbirth Educator Certification, I am applying to nursing school and then midwifery school after that. YAY!
Water, Pencil and Notebook.
Back-to-back Hall-of-Famers at the end to save this otherwise dud of a pack. This card is pretty cool, as it symbolizes Brett Hull's amazing 86-goal 1990-91 season! I don't think we'll see a total like that again anytime soon.
tomatoes (a 28 oz can of either whole plum tomatoes or diced tomatoes, with their juice)
-Various fantastic shapes.
The light in Australia is extremely bright and clouds and sky can merge into a flat, toneless expanse without a bit of art. I used a circular polarizer quite often while taking drive-by shots. It's worth noticing that the effect was also enhanced by the fact that the car had tinted windows, which cut down on glare.
Oh, STAR TREK, how I’ve missed you.
Which is one of the reasons I decided to get a cane today. I've been thinking about trying to make the switch to a cane for a few days and I figured now I really need to do it because I'm going to need to have at least one free hand for child wrangling on Saturday.
HISSSSSSSS!
I think how many men and women
But these are questions that your lawyer should address.
A number of individuals and sections from the army have defected, some claiming to have formed a Free Syrian Army. As yet there does not appear to have been any organised armed defence. The central city of Hama became the symbol of this popular opposition when its inhabitants occupied and barricaded it against the entry of tanks for several weeks. But this did not become an armed defence. The situation in Hama opened up the possibility for the formation of armed defence squads to man the barricades against the tanks and defend the city of 800,000. Here was an embryonic commune that could have created a militia to defend itself. But it did not; the ban on arms remained and the lessons of other revolutions, including Libya, were not heeded. Clearly this reflects a class contradiction between the liberal opposition reluctant to resort to arms for fear that this will be used by Assad to justify his armed suppression, and radicals who have sworn that Hama will not be destroyed again as it was in 1982. How they would do that without resorting to arms is unclear. It is likely that Assad knows that the pressure to arm the opposition is building and has now turned once again to open repression to target the militants. On the 29 of July the regime moved its tanks in shooting indiscriminately at protesters and dwellings.
I'm really grateful to Clive's generous spirit for putting together such an interesting collection of artists and encouraging playful creativity like this. Expect more hinged beings in due course, perhaps dancing to a tune or two.
MKK also assists participants in devising strategies for addressing the social issues by using the media as a tool to help resolve and address these issues.
poetry goes
They went slowly, slowly
It has always been one of my favorites:
she is going to San Antonio to see The Police in November, bitches!
This is all nit-picking, so far. The dialogue with the star child is only the tip of the iceberg and it, alone, doesn't condemn the entire existential dialectic upon which the ending has come to rest. The decision that Shepard is faced with is excellent and reflective of the very meaningful premise of the series.
Until next time, thanks for visiting
Krikor “George” Messerlian-- A 68 year-old Armenian immigrant, beaten to death by a group of black youths.
